Chapter 30 The Turbulent Sixties


 Kennedy versus Nixon: The First Televised Presidential Candidate Debate On Monday evening, September 26, 1960, John F. Kennedy and Richard M. Nixon faced each other in the nation’s first televised debate between two presidential candidates. Kennedy, the relatively unknown Democratic challenger, had proposed the debates; Nixon, confident of his mastery of television, had accepted even though, as Eisenhower’s vice president and the early front-runner in the election, he had more to lose and less to gain. Richard Nixon arrived an hour early at the CBS studio in Chicago, looking tired and ill at ease. He was still recovering from a knee injury that had slowed his campaign and left him pale and weak as he pursued a hectic catch-up schedule. Makeup experts offered to hide Nixon’s heavy beard and soften his prominent jowls, but the GOP candidate declined, preferring to let an aide apply a light coat of Max Factor’s “Lazy Shave,” a pancake cosmetic. John Kennedy, tanned from openair campaigning in California and rested by a day spent nearly free of distracting activity, wore very light

 makeup. He also changed from a gray to a dark blue suit better adapted to the intense television lighting. At 8:30 P . M . central time, moderator Howard K. Smith welcomed a viewing audience estimated at seventy-seven million. Kennedy led off, echoing Abraham Lincoln by saying that the nation faced the question of “whether the world will exist half slave and half free.” Although the ground rules limited the first debate to domestic issues, Kennedy argued that foreign and domestic policy were inseparable. He accused the Republicans of letting the country drift at home and abroad. “I think it’s time America started moving again,” he concluded. Nixon, caught off guard, seemed to agree with Kennedy’s assessment of the nation’s problems, but he contended that he had better solutions. “Our disagreement,” the vice president pointed out, “is not about the goals for America but only about the means to reach those goals.” For the rest of the hour, the two candidates answered questions from a panel of journalists. Radiating confidence

Watch the Video


Kennedy–Nixon Debate


Kennedy–Nixon Debate


 and self-assurance, Kennedy used a flow of statistics and details to create the image of a man deeply knowledgeable about all aspects of government. Nixon fought back with a defense of the Eisenhower record, but

 he seemed nervous and unsure of himself. The reaction shots of each candidate listening to the other’s remarks showed Kennedy calm and serene, Nixon tense and uncomfortable.



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 Polls taken during the following few weeks revealed a sharp swing to Kennedy. Many Democrats and independents who had thought him too young or too inexperienced were impressed by his performance. Nixon suffered more from his unattractive image than from what he said; those who heard the debate on radio thought the Republican candidate more than held his own. In the three additional debates held during the campaign, Nixon improved his performance notably, wearing makeup to soften his appearance and taking the offensive from Kennedy on the issues. But the damage had been done. A postelection poll revealed that of four million voters who were influenced by the debates, three million voted for Kennedy. The televised debates were only one of many factors influencing the outcome of the 1960 election. In essence, Kennedy won because he took full advantage of all his opportunities. Lightly regarded by Democratic leaders, he won the nomination by appealing to the rank and file in the primaries, but then he astutely chose Lyndon Johnson of Texas as his running mate to blunt Nixon’s southern strategy. uring the fall campaign, Kennedy exploited the national mood of frustration that had followed Sputnik. (See the Feature Essay in Chapter 29, “The Reaction to Sputnik,” pp. 694–695.) At home, he promised to stimulate the lagging economy and carry forward long overdue reforms in education, health care, and civil rights under the banner of the New Frontier. Abroad, he pledged a renewed commitment to the Cold War, vowing he would lead the nation to victory over the Soviet Union. He met the issue of his Catholicism head on, telling a group of Protestant ministers in Houston that as president he would always place country above religion. In the shrewdest move of all, he won over African American voters by helping to secure the release of Martin Luther King, Jr., from a Georgia jail where the civil rights leader was being held on a trumped-up charge. The Democratic victory in 1960 was paper thin. Kennedy’s edge in the popular vote was only two-tenths of 1 percent, and his wide margin in the electoral college (303 to 219) was tainted by voting irregularities in several states—notably Illinois and Texas—which went Democratic by very slender majorities. Yet even though he had no mandate, Kennedy’s triumph did mark a sharp political shift. In contrast to the aging Eisenhower, Kennedy symbolized youth, energy, and ambition. His mastery of the new medium of television reflected his sensitivity to the changes taking place in American life in the 1960s. He came to office promising reform at home and advances abroad. Over the next eight years, he and Lyndon Johnson achieved many of their goals. Yet the nation also became engulfed in angry protests, violent demonstrations, and sweeping social change in one of the stormiest decades in American history.

D


Election of 1960
Electoral Vote by State
DEMOCRATIC
John F. Kennedy 


Harry F. Byrd




REPUBLICAN
Richard M. Nixon 


Popular Vote
34,227,096


34,108,546


502,363


MINOR PARTIES

68,838,005














































 ALASKA



 HAWAII







































Kennedy Intensifies the Cold War
 How did the Cold War intensify under Kennedy? John F. Kennedy was determined to succeed where he believed Eisenhower had failed. Critical of his predecessor for holding down defense spending and apparently allowing the Soviet Union to open up a dangerous lead in ICBMs, Kennedy sought to warn the nation of its peril and lead it to victory in the Cold War. In his inaugural address, the young president sounded the alarm. Ignoring the domestic issues aired during the campaign, he dealt exclusively with the world. “Let every nation know, whether it wishes us well or ill, that we shall pay any price, bear any burden, meet any hardship, support any friend, oppose any foe,” Kennedy declared, “to assure the survival and success of liberty. We will do all this and more.” From the day he took office, John F. Kennedy gave foreign policy top priority. In part, the decision reflected the perilous world situation, the immediate dangers ranging from the unresolved Berlin crisis to the emergence of Fidel Castro as a Soviet ally in Cuba. But it also corresponded to Kennedy’s personal priorities. As a congressman and senator, he had been an intense cold warrior. Bored by committee work and legislative details, he had focused on foreign policy in the Senate, gaining a seat on the Foreign Relations Committee and publishing a book of speeches, The Strategy of Peace, in early 1960. His appointments reflected his determination to win the Cold War. His choice of Dean Rusk, an experienced but unassertive diplomat, to head the State Department indicated that Kennedy

Kennedy Intensifies the Cold War


 planned to be his own secretary of state. He surrounded himself with young pragmatic advisers who prided themselves on toughness: McGeorge Bundy, dean of Harvard College, became national security adviser; Walt W. Rostow, an MIT economist, was Bundy’s deputy; and Robert McNamara, the youthful president of the Ford Motor Company, took over as secretary of defense. These New Frontiersmen, later dubbed “the best and the brightest” by journalist David Halberstam, all shared a hard-line view of the Soviet Union and the belief that American security depended on superior force and the willingness to use it. Walt Rostow summed up their view of the contest with Russia best when he wrote, “The cold war comes down to this test of whether we and the democratic world are fundamentally tougher and more purposeful in the defense of our vital interests than they are in the pursuit of their global ambitions.”

Flexible Response
 The first goal of the Kennedy administration was to build up the nation’s armed forces. During the 1960 campaign, Kennedy had warned that the Soviets were opening a missile gap. In fact, due largely to Eisenhower’s foresight, the United States had a significant lead in nuclear striking power by early 1961, with a fleet of more than 600 B-52 bombers, 2 Polaris submarines, and 16 Atlas ICBMs capable of delivering more than 2,000 warheads against Russian targets. Nevertheless, the new administration, intent on putting the Soviets on the defensive, authorized the construction of an awesome nuclear arsenal that included 1,000 Minuteman solid-fuel ICBMs (five times the number Eisenhower had believed necessary) and 32 Polaris submarines carrying 656 missiles. The United States thus opened a missile gap in reverse, creating the possibility of a successful American first strike. At the same time, the Kennedy administration augmented conventional military strength. Secretary of Defense McNamara developed plans to add five combat-ready army divisions, three tactical air wings, and a ten-division strategic reserve. These vast increases led to a $6 billion jump in the defense budget in 1961 alone. The president took a personal interest in counterinsurgency. He expanded the Special Forces unit at Fort Bragg, North Carolina, and insisted, over army objections, that it adopt a distinctive green beret as a symbol of its elite status. The purpose of this buildup was to create an alternative to Eisenhower’s policy of massive retaliation. Instead of responding to communist moves with nuclear threats, the United States could now call on a wide spectrum of force—ranging from ICBMs to Green Berets. Thus, as Robert McNamara explained, the new strategy of flexible response meant the United States could “choose among several operational plans. We shall be committed only to a system that gives us the ability to use our forces in a controlled and deliberate way.” The danger was that such a powerful arsenal might tempt the new administration to test its strength against the Soviet Union.

 Crisis over Berlin The first confrontation came in Germany. Since 1958, Soviet Premier Khrushchev had been threatening to sign a peace treaty that would put access to the isolated western zones of Berlin under



 the control of East Germany. The steady flight of skilled workers to the West through the Berlin escape route weakened the East German regime dangerously, and the Soviets believed they had to resolve this issue quickly. At a summit meeting in Vienna in June 1961, Kennedy and Khrushchev focused on Berlin as the key issue. The Russian leader called the current situation “intolerable” and announced the Soviet Union would proceed with an East German peace treaty. Kennedy was equally adamant, defending the American presence in Berlin and refusing to give up occupation rights that he considered crucial to the defense of western Europe. In their last session, the failure to reach agreement took on an ominous tone. “I want peace,” Khrushchev declared, “but, if you want war, that is your problem.” “It is you, not I,” the young president replied, “who wants to force a change.” When the Soviet leader said he would sign a German peace treaty by December, Kennedy added, “It will be a cold winter.” The climax came sooner than either man expected. On July 25, Kennedy delivered an impassioned televised address to the American people in which he called the defense of Berlin “essential” to “the entire Free World.” Announcing a series of arms increases, including $3 billion more in defense spending, the president took the unprecedented step of calling more than 150,000 reservists and national guardsmen to active duty. Aware of superior American nuclear striking power, Khrushchev settled for a stalemate. On August 13, the Soviets sealed off their zone of the city. They began the construction of the Berlin Wall to stop the flow of brains and talent to the West. For a brief time, Russian and American tanks maneuvered within sight of each other at Checkpoint Charlie (where the American and Soviet zones met), but by fall, the tension gradually eased. The Soviets signed a separate peace treaty that did not affect U.S. occupation rights; Berlin—like Germany and, indeed, all of Europe—remained divided between the East and the West. Neither side could claim a victory, but Kennedy believed that at least he had proved to the world America’s willingness to honor its commitments.

Containment in Southeast Asia
 Two weeks before Kennedy’s inauguration, Khrushchev gave a speech in Moscow in which he declared Soviet support for “wars of national liberation.” The Russian leader’s words were actually aimed more at China than the United States; the two powerful communist nations were now rivals for influence in the developing world. But the new American president, ignoring the growing Sino-Soviet split, concluded the United States and Russia were locked in a struggle for the hearts and minds of the uncommitted in Asia, Africa, and Latin America. Calling for a new policy of nation building, Kennedy advocated financial and technical assistance designed to help developing-world nations achieve economic modernization and stable pro-Western governments. Measures ranging from the formation of the idealistic Peace Corps to the ambitious Alliance for Progress—a massive economic aid program for Latin America—were part of this effort. Unfortunately, Kennedy relied even more on counterinsurgency and the Green Berets to beat back the communist challenge in the developing world. Southeast Asia offered the gravest test. The American decision to back Ngo Dinh Diem (see p. 710) had prevented the holding of



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 their war. They are the ones who have to win it or lose it.” But at the same time, Kennedy was not prepared to accept the possible loss of all Southeast Asia. Saying it would be “a great mistake” to withdraw from South Vietnam, he told reporters, “Strongly on our mind is what happened in the case of China at the end of World War II, where China was lost. We don’t want that.” Although aides later claimed he planned to pull out after the 1964 election, Kennedy raised the stakes by tacitly approving a coup that led to Diem’s overthrow and death on November 1, 1963. The resulting power vacuum in Saigon made further American involvement in Vietnam almost certain.

Containing Castro: The
Bay of Pigs Fiasco
 Kennedy’s determination to check global communist expansion reached a peak of intensity in Cuba. In the 1960 campaign, pointing to the growing ties between the Soviet Union and Fidel Castro’s regime, he had accused the Republicans of permitting Flames engulf Buddhist monk, the Reverend Quang Duc, who set himself afire at an intersection in a “communist satellite” to arise on “our very Saigon, Vietnam, to protest persecution of Buddhists by Vietnam president Ngo Dinh Diem and his doorstep.” Kennedy had even issued a stategovernment. Other monks placed themselves in front of the wheels of nearby fire trucks to prevent ment backing “anti-Castro forces in exile,” them from reaching Duc. calling them “fighters for freedom” who held out hope for “overthrowing Castro.” elections throughout Vietnam in 1956, as called for in the Geneva In reality, the Eisenhower administration had been training accords. Instead, Diem sought to establish a separate government in a group of Cuban exiles in Guatemala since March 1960 as part the South with large-scale American economic and military assisof a CIA plan to topple the Castro regime. Many of the new presitance. By the time Kennedy entered the White House, however, the dent’s advisers had doubts about the proposed invasion. Some saw communist government in North Vietnam, led by Ho Chi Minh, was little chance for success because the operation depended heavily directing the efforts of Vietcong rebels in the South. As the guerrilla on a broad uprising of the Cuban people. Others—notably Senator war intensified in the fall of 1961, the president sent two trusted advisWilliam Fulbright of Arkansas, chairman of the Foreign Relations ers, Walt Rostow and General Maxwell Taylor, to South Vietnam. Committee—viewed it as an immoral act that would discredit the They returned favoring the dispatch of eight thousand American United States. “The Castro regime is a thorn in the flesh,” Fulbright combat troops. “As an area for the operation of U.S. troops,” reported argued, “but it is not a dagger in the heart.” The president, however, General Taylor, “SVN [South Vietnam] is not an excessively difficult committed by his own campaign rhetoric and assured of success or unpleasant place to operate. . . . The risks of backing into a major by the military, decided to proceed. Asian war by way of SVN are present but are not impressive.” On April 17, 1961, fourteen hundred Cuban exiles moved The president decided against sending in combat troops in 1961, ashore at the Bay of Pigs on the southern coast of Cuba. Even but he authorized substantial increases in economic aid to Diem and though the United States had masterminded the entire operation, in the size of the military mission in Saigon. The number of American Kennedy insisted on covert action, even canceling at the last minute advisers in Vietnam grew from fewer than one thousand in 1961 to a planned American air strike on the beachhead. With air superimore than sixteen thousand by late 1963. The flow of supplies and the ority, Castro’s well-trained forces had no difficulty in quashing the creation of “strategic hamlets,” fortified villages designed to protect invasion. They killed nearly five hundred exiles and forced the rest the peasantry from the Vietcong, slowed the communist momentum. to surrender within forty-eight hours. American helicopters gave government forces mobility against the Aghast at the swiftness of the defeat, President Kennedy took Vietcong, but by 1963, the situation had again become critical. Diem personal responsibility for the Bay of Pigs. In his address to the had failed to win the support of his own people; Buddhist monks set American people, however, he showed no remorse for arranging themselves aflame in public protests against him; and even Diem’s the violation of a neighboring country’s sovereignty, only regret own generals plotted his overthrow. at the outcome. Above all, he expressed renewed defiance, warning President Kennedy was in a quandary. He realized that the fate the Soviets that “our restraint is not inexhaustible.” He went on to of South Vietnam would be determined not by America but by the assert that the United States would resist “communist penetration” Vietnamese. “In the final analysis,” he said in September 1963, “it is in the Western Hemisphere, terming it part of the “primary

Kennedy Intensifies the Cold War


 obligations . . . to the security of our nation.” For the remainder of his presidency, Kennedy continued to harass the Castro regime, imposing an economic blockade on Cuba, supporting a continuing series of raids by exile groups operating out of Florida, and failing to stop the CIA from experimenting with bizarre plots to assassinate Fidel Castro.

Containing Castro: The Cuban
Missile Crisis
 The climax of Kennedy’s crusade came in October 1962 with the Cuban missile crisis. Throughout the summer and early fall, the Soviets engaged in a massive arms buildup in Cuba, ostensibly to protect Castro from an American invasion. In the United States, Republican candidates in the 1962 congressional elections called for a firm American response; Kennedy contented himself with a stern warning against the introduction of any offensive weapons, believing their presence would directly threaten American security. Khrushchev publicly denied any such intent, but secretly he took a daring gamble, building sites for twenty-four medium-range (1,000-mile) and eighteen intermediate-range (2,000-mile) missiles in Cuba. Later he claimed his purpose was purely defensive, but most likely he was responding to the pressures from his own military to close the enormous strategic gap in nuclear striking power that Kennedy had opened. Unfortunately, the Kennedy administration had stopped direct U-2 overflights of Cuba in August. Fearful that recently installed Soviet surface-to-air missiles could bring down the American spy plane and create an international incident similar to the 1960 U-2 episode (see p. 712), the White House, over the objections of CIA Director John McCone, limited U-2 flights to the air space bordering the island. McCone finally prevailed on the president to resume direct overflights, and on October 14 the first such mission brought back indisputable photographic evidence of the missile sites, which were nearing completion. As soon as President Kennedy was informed of this development, he decided to keep it secret while he consulted with a hand-picked group of advisers to consider how to respond. In the ExComm, as this group became known, the initial preference for an immediate air strike gradually gave way to discussion of either a full-scale invasion of Cuba or a naval blockade of the island. The president and his advisers ruled out diplomacy, rejecting a proposal to offer the withdrawal of obsolete American Jupiter missiles from Turkey in return for a similar Russian pullout in Cuba. Kennedy finally agreed to a two-step procedure. He would proclaim a quarantine of Cuba to prevent the arrival of new missiles and threaten a nuclear confrontation to force the removal of those already there. If the Russians did not cooperate, then the United States would invade Cuba and dismantle the missiles by force. On the evening of October 22, the president informed the nation of the existence of the Soviet missiles and his plans to remove them. He blamed Khrushchev for “this clandestine, reckless, and provocative threat to world peace,” and he made it clear that any missile attack from Cuba would lead to “a full retaliatory response upon the Soviet Union.” For the next six days, the world hovered on the brink of nuclear catastrophe. Khrushchev replied defiantly, accusing Kennedy of pushing mankind “to the abyss of a world nuclear-missile war.”



 In the Atlantic, some sixteen Soviet ships continued on course toward Cuba, while the American navy was deployed to intercept them five hundred miles from the island. In Florida, nearly a quarter million men were being concentrated in the largest invasion force ever assembled in the continental United States. The first break came at midweek when the Soviet ships suddenly halted to avert a confrontation at sea. “We’re eyeball to eyeball,” commented Secretary of State Dean Rusk, “and I think the other fellow just blinked.” On Friday, Khrushchev sent Kennedy a long, rambling letter offering a face-saving way out: Russia would remove the missiles in return for an American promise never to invade Cuba. The president was ready to accept when a second Russian message raised the stakes by insisting that American Jupiter missiles be withdrawn from Turkey. Heeding the advice of his brother, attorney general Robert Kennedy, the president refused to bargain; Khrushchev had endangered world peace by putting the missiles in Cuba secretly, and he must take them out immediately. Nevertheless, while the military went ahead with plans for the invasion of Cuba, the president, heeding his brother’s advice, decided to make one last appeal for peace. Ignoring the second Russian message, he sent a cable to Khrushchev accepting his original offer. On Saturday night, October 27, Robert Kennedy met with Soviet ambassador Anatoly Dobrynin to make clear it was the last chance to avert nuclear confrontation. “We had to have a commitment by tomorrow that those bases would be removed,” Robert Kennedy recalled telling him. “He should understand that if they did not remove those bases, we would remove them.” Then the president’s brother calmly remarked that if Khrushchev did not back down, “there would be not only dead Americans but dead Russians as well.” In reality, John F. Kennedy was not quite so ready to risk nuclear war. He instructed his brother to assure Dobrynin that the Jupiter missiles would soon be removed from Turkey. The president preferred that the missile swap be done privately, but twenty-five years later, Secretary of State Dean Rusk revealed that JFK had instructed him to arrange a deal through the United Nations involving “the removal of both the Jupiters and the missiles in Cuba.” In recently released transcripts of his meetings with his advisers, the president reaffirmed his intention of making a missile trade with Khrushchev publicly as a last resort to avoid nuclear war. “We can’t very well invade Cuba with all its toil,” he commented, “when we could have gotten them out by making a deal on the same missiles in Turkey.” President Kennedy never had to make this final concession. At nine the next morning, Khrushchev agreed to remove the missiles in return only for Kennedy’s promise not to invade Cuba. The crisis was over. The world, however, had come perilously close to a nuclear conflict. We now know the Soviets had nuclear warheads in Cuba, not only for twenty of the medium-range missiles, but also for short-range tactical launchers designed to be used against an American invading force. If Kennedy had approved the military’s recommendations for an invasion of Cuba, the consequences might have been disastrous. The peaceful resolution of the Cuban missile crisis became a personal and political triumph for John F. Kennedy. His party successfully overcame the Republican challenge in the November elections, and his own popularity reached new heights.



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

Watch the Video


President John F. Kennedy and the Cuban Missile Crisis


 The Cuban Missile Crisis occurred in 1962 when U.S. spy planes detected Soviets supplying nuclear warheads being delivered to Cuba.

 The American people, on the defensive since Sputnik, suddenly felt that they had proved their superiority over the Russians. Arthur Schlesinger, Jr., Kennedy’s confidant and later his biographer, claimed that the Cuban crisis showed the “whole world . . . the ripening of an American leadership unsurpassed in the responsible management of power . . . . It was this combination of toughness and restraint, of will, nerve and wisdom, so brilliantly controlled, so matchlessly calibrated, that dazzled the world.” The Cuban missile crisis had more substantial results as well. Shaken by their close call, Kennedy and Khrushchev agreed to install a “hot line” to speed direct communication between Washington and Moscow in an emergency. Long-stalled negotiations over the reduction of nuclear testing suddenly resumed, leading to the limited test ban treaty of 1963, which outlawed tests in

 the atmosphere while still permitting them underground. Above all, Kennedy displayed a new maturity as a result of the crisis. In a speech at American University in June 1963, he shifted from the rhetoric of confrontation to that of conciliation. Speaking of the Russians, he said, “Our most basic common link is the fact that we all inhabit this planet. We all breathe the same air. We all cherish our children’s future. And we are all mortal.” Despite these hopeful words, the missile crisis also had an unfortunate consequence. Those who believed that the Russians understood only the language of force were confirmed in their penchant for a hard line. Hawks who had backed Kennedy’s military buildup believed events had justified a policy of nuclear superiority. The Russian leaders drew similar conclusions. Aware the United States had a four-to-one advantage in nuclear striking

The New Frontier at Home


 power during the Cuban crisis, one Soviet official told his American counterpart, “Never will we be caught like this again.” After 1962, the Soviets embarked on a crash program to build up their navy and to overtake the American lead in nuclear missiles. Within five years, they had the nucleus of a modern fleet and had surpassed the United States in ICBMs. Kennedy’s fleeting moment of triumph thus ensured the escalation of the arms race. His legacy was a bittersweet one of short-term success and long-term anxiety.

The New Frontier at Home
 What was the “New Frontier,” and what did it accomplish? Kennedy hoped to change the course of history at home as well as abroad. His election marked the arrival of a new generation of leadership. For the first time, people born in the twentieth century who had entered political life after World War II were in charge of national affairs. Kennedy’s inaugural call to get the nation moving again was particularly attractive to young people who had shunned political involvement during the Eisenhower years. The new administration reflected Kennedy’s aura of youth and energy. Major cabinet appointments went to activists— notably Connecticut governor Abraham Ribicoff as secretary of health, education, and welfare; labor lawyer Arthur J. Goldberg as secretary of labor; and Arizona congressman Stuart Udall as secretary of the interior. The most controversial choice was Robert F. Kennedy, the president’s brother, as attorney general. Critics scoffed at his lack of legal experience, leading JFK to note jokingly he wanted to give Bobby “a little experience before he goes out to practice law.” In fact, the president prized his brother’s loyalty and shrewd political advice. Equally important were the members of the White House staff who handled domestic affairs. Like their counterparts in foreign policy, these New Frontiersmen—Kenneth O’Donnell, Theodore Sorensen, Richard Goodwin, and Walter Heller—prided themselves on being tough-minded and pragmatic. In contrast to Eisenhower, Kennedy relied heavily on academics and intellectuals to help him infuse the nation with energy and a new sense of direction. Kennedy’s greatest asset was his own personality. A cool, attractive, and intelligent man, he possessed a sense of style that endeared him to the American public. Encouraged by his wife, Jacqueline, the president invited artists and musicians as well as corporate executives to White House functions, and he sprinkled his speeches with references to Emerson and Shakespeare. He seemed to be a new Lancelot, bent on calling forth the best in national life; admirers likened his inner circle to King Arthur’s court at Camelot. Reporters loved him, both for his fact-filled and candid press conferences and for his witty comments. After an embarrassing foreign policy failure, when his standing in the polls actually went up, he remarked, “It’s just like Eisenhower. The worse I do, the more popular I get.”

The Congressional Obstacle
 Neither Kennedy’s wit nor his charm proved strong enough to break the logjam in Congress. Since the late 1940s, a series of reform bills ranging from health care to federal aid to education



 had been stalled on Capitol Hill. Despite JFK’s victory, the election of 1960 clouded the outlook for his New Frontier program. The Democrats had lost twenty seats in the House and two in the Senate; even though they retained majorities in both branches, a conservative coalition of northern Republicans and southern Democrats opposed all efforts at reform. The situation was especially critical in the House, where 101 southern representatives held the balance of power between 160 northern Democrats and 174 Republicans. Aided by Speaker Sam Rayburn, Kennedy was able to enlarge the Rules Committee and overcome a traditional conservative roadblock, but the narrowness of the vote, 217 to 212, revealed how difficult it would be to enact reform measures. The president gave up the fight for health care in the Senate and settled instead for a modest increase in the minimum wage and the passage of manpower training and arearedevelopment legislation. Kennedy had no more success in enacting his program in 1962 and 1963. The conservative coalition stood firmly against education and health-care proposals. Shifting ground, the president did win approval for a trade expansion act in 1962 designed to lower tariff barriers, but no significant reform legislation was passed. Although the composition of Congress was his main obstacle, Kennedy’s greater interest in foreign policy and his distaste for legislative infighting contributed to the outcome. JFK did not enjoy “blarneying with pompous congressmen and simply would not take the time to do it,” one observer noted. As a result, the New Frontier languished in Congress.

Economic Advance
 Kennedy gave a higher priority to the sluggish American economy. During the last years of Eisenhower’s administration, the rate of economic growth had slowed to just over 2 percent annually, while unemployment rose to new heights with each recession. JFK was determined to stimulate the economy to achieve a much higher rate of long-term growth. In part, he wanted to redeem his campaign pledge to get the nation moving again; he also believed the United States had to surpass the Soviet Union in economic vitality. Kennedy received conflicting advice from the experts. Those who claimed the problem was essentially a technological one urged manpower training and area-redevelopment programs to modernize American industry. Others called for federal spending to rebuild the nation’s public facilities—from parks and playgrounds to decaying bridges and urban courthouses. Kennedy sided with the first group, largely because Congress was opposed to massive spending on public works. The actual stimulation of the economy, however, came not from social programs but from greatly increased appropriations for defense and space. A $6 billion increase in the arms budget in 1961 gave the economy a great lift, and Kennedy’s decision to send an astronaut to the moon eventually cost $25 billion. By 1962, more than half the federal budget was devoted to space and defense; aircraft and computer companies in the South and West benefited, but unemployment remained uncomfortably high in the older industrial areas of the Northeast and Midwest. The administration’s desire to keep the inflation rate low led to a serious confrontation with the business community. Kennedy



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 relied on informal wage and price guidelines to hold down the cost of living. But in April 1962, just after the president had persuaded the steelworkers’ union to accept a new contract with no wage increases and only a few additional benefits, U.S. Steel head Roger Blough informed Kennedy that his company was raising steel prices by $6 a ton. Outraged, the president publicly called the increase “a wholly unjustifiable and irresponsible defiance of the public interest” and accused Blough of displaying “contempt for the interests of 185 million Americans.” Privately, Kennedy was even blunter. He confided to aides, “My father always told me that all businessmen were sons-of-bitches, but I never believed it till now.” Roger Blough soon gave way. The president’s tongue-lashing, along with a cutoff in Pentagon steel orders and the threat of an antitrust suit, forced him to reconsider. When several smaller steel companies refused to raise their prices in hopes of expanding their share of the market, U.S. Steel rolled back its prices. The business community deeply resented the president’s action, and when the stock market, which had been rising steadily since 1960, suddenly fell sharply in late May 1962, analysts were quick to label the decline “the Kennedy market.” Troubled by his strained relations with business and by the continued lag in economic growth, the president decided to adopt a more unorthodox approach in 1963. Walter Heller, chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers, had been arguing since 1961 for a major cut in taxes in the belief it would stimulate consumer spending and give the economy the jolt it needed. The idea of a tax cut and resulting deficits during a period of prosperity went against economic orthodoxy, but Kennedy finally gave his approval. In January 1963, the president proposed a tax reduction of $13.5 billion, asserting that “the unrealistically heavy drag of federal income taxes on private purchasing power” was the “largest single barrier to full employment.” When finally enacted by Congress in 1964, the massive tax cut led to sustained economic advance for the rest of the decade. Kennedy’s economic policy was far more successful than his legislative efforts. Although the rate of economic growth doubled to 4.5 percent by the end of 1963 and unemployment was reduced substantially, the cost of living rose only 1.3 percent a year. Personal income went up 13 percent in the early 1960s, but the greatest gains came in corporate profits—up 67 percent in the period. Critics pointed to the Kennedy administration’s failure to close the glaring loopholes in the tax laws that benefited the rich and its lack of effort to help those at the bottom by forcing redistribution of national wealth. Despite the overall economic growth, the public sector continued to be neglected. “I am not sure what the advantage is,” complained economist John Kenneth Galbraith, “in having a few more dollars to spend if the air is too dirty to breathe, the water too polluted to drink, the commuters are losing out in the struggle to get in and out of the cities, the streets are filthy, and the schools so bad that the young, perhaps wisely, stay away.”

Moving Slowly on Civil Rights
 Kennedy faced a genuine dilemma over the issue of civil rights. Despite his own lack of a strong record while in the Senate, he had portrayed himself during the 1960 campaign as a crusader for African American rights. He had promised to launch an

 attack on segregation in the Deep South, but his fear of alienating the large bloc of southern Democrats forced him to downplay civil rights legislation. The president’s solution was to defer congressional action in favor of executive leadership in this area. He directed his brother, Attorney General Robert Kennedy, to continue and expand the Eisenhower administration’s efforts to achieve voting rights for southern blacks. To register previously disfranchised citizens, the Justice Department worked with the civil rights movement—notably the Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee (SNCC)—in the Deep South. In two years, the Kennedy administration increased the number of voting rights suits fivefold. Yet the attorney general could not force the FBI to provide protection for the civil rights volunteers who risked their lives by encouraging African Americans to register. “SNCC’s only contact with federal authority,” noted one observer, “consisted of the FBI agents who stood by taking notes while local policemen beat up SNCC members.” Other efforts had equally mixed results. Vice President Lyndon Johnson headed a presidential Commission on Equal Employment Opportunities that worked with defense industries and other government contractors to increase the number of jobs for African Americans. But a limited budget and a reliance on voluntary cooperation prevented any dramatic gains; African American employment improved only in direct proportion to economic growth in the early 1960s. Kennedy did succeed in appointing a number of African Americans to high government positions: Robert Weaver became chief of the federal housing agency, and Thurgood Marshall, who pleaded the Brown v. Topeka school desegregation case before the Supreme Court, was named to the U.S. Circuit Court. On the other hand, among his judicial appointments, Kennedy included one Mississippi jurist who referred to African Americans in court as “niggers” and once compared them to “a bunch of chimpanzees.” The civil rights movement refused to accept Kennedy’s indirect approach. In May 1961, the Congress of Racial Equality (CORE) sponsored a freedom ride in which a biracial group attempted to test a 1960 Supreme Court decision outlawing segregation in all bus and train stations used in interstate commerce. When they arrived in Birmingham, Alabama, the freedom riders were attacked by a mob of angry whites. The attorney general quickly dispatched several hundred federal marshals to protect the freedom riders, but the president, deeply involved in the Berlin crisis, was more upset at the distraction the protesters created. Kennedy directed one of his aides to get in touch with the leaders of CORE. “Tell them to call it off,” he demanded. “Stop them.” In September, after the attorney general finally convinced the Interstate Commerce Commission to issue an order banning segregation in interstate terminals and buses, the freedom rides ended. The Kennedy administration then sought to prevent further confrontations by involving civil rights activists in its voting drive. A pattern of belated reaction to southern racism marked the basic approach of the Kennedys. When James Meredith courageously sought admission to the all-white University of Mississippi in 1962, the president and the attorney general worked closely with Mississippi governor Ross Barnett to avoid violence. A transcript of Robert Kennedy’s conversation with Governor Barnett on

The New Frontier at Home


Watch the Video




Photographing the Civil Rights Movement


 African American civil rights demonstrators in Birmingham, Alabama, encounter high-velocity fire hoses in response to their nonviolent demonstrations during the spring of 1963. This and other similar photographs of young African Americans being assaulted by the authorities in Birmingham rallied support for the civil rights protestors and their political and economic demands.

 September 25 indicates that the attorney general focused on the legal rather than the moral issues involved: RFK:

 I think the problem is that the federal courts have acted and when there is a conflict between your state and the federal courts under arrangements made some years ago— Barnett: The institution is supported by the taxpayers of this state and controlled by the Trustees. RFK: Governor, you are a part of the United States.

 Barnett: . . . I am going to treat you with every courtesy, but I won’t agree to let that boy get to Ole Miss. I will never agree to that. I would rather spend my whole life in a penitentiary than do that. RFK: I have a responsibility to enforce the laws of the United States. Barnett: I appreciate that. You have a responsibility. Why don’t you let the NAACP run their own affairs and quit cooperating with that crowd?



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

Watch the Video


Civil Rights March on Washington


 The March on Washington, organized by civil rights leaders to maintain political pressure on the Kennedy administration, was held on August 28, 1936. The rally in front of the Lincoln Memorial was highlighted by Martin Luther King, Jr.’s famous “I Have a Dream” speech.

 Despite Barnett’s later promise of cooperation, the night before Meredith enrolled at the University of Mississippi, a mob attacked the federal marshals and national guard troops sent to protect him. The violence left 2 dead and 375 injured, including 166 marshals and 12 guardsmen, but Meredith attended the university and eventually graduated. In 1963, Kennedy sent the deputy attorney general to face down Governor George C. Wallace, an avowed segregationist who had promised “to stand in the schoolhouse door” to prevent the integration of the University of Alabama. After a brief confrontation, Wallace yielded to federal authority, and

 two African American students peacefully desegregated the state university.

“I Have a Dream”
 Martin Luther King, Jr., finally forced Kennedy to abandon his cautious tactics and come out openly in behalf of racial justice. In the spring of 1963, King began a massive protest in Birmingham, one of the South’s most segregated cities. Public marches and demonstrations aimed at integrating public facilities and opening up jobs for African Americans quickly led to police harassment and

“Let Us Continue”


 many arrests, including that of King himself. Police Commissioner Eugene “Bull” Connor was determined to crush the civil rights movement; King was equally determined to prevail. Writing from his cell in Birmingham, he vowed an active campaign to bring the issue of racial injustice to national attention. Bull Connor played directly into King’s hands. On May 3, as six thousand children marched in place of the jailed protesters, authorities broke up a demonstration with clubs, snarling police dogs, and high-pressure water hoses strong enough to take the bark off a tree. With a horrified nation watching scene after scene of this brutality on television, the Kennedy administration quickly intervened to arrange a settlement with the Birmingham civic leaders that ended the violence and granted the protesters most of their demands. More important, Kennedy finally ended his long hesitation and sounded the call for action. “We are confronted primarily with a moral issue,” he told the nation on June 11. “It is as old as the Scriptures and is as clear as the American Constitution.” Eight days later, the administration sponsored civil rights legislation providing equal access to all public accommodations as well as an extension of voting rights for African Americans. Despite pleas from the government for an end to demonstrations and protests, civil rights leaders kept pressure on the administration. They scheduled a massive March on Washington for August 1963. On August 28, more than 200,000 marchers gathered for a daylong rally in front of the Lincoln Memorial where they listened to hymns, speeches, and prayers for racial justice. The climax of the event was Martin Luther King, Jr.’s, eloquent “I Have A Dream” speech. By the time of Kennedy’s death in November 1963, his civil rights legislation was well on its way to passage in Congress. Yet even this achievement did not fully satisfy his critics. For two years, they had waited for him to deliver on his campaign promise to wipe out housing discrimination “with a stroke of the pen.” The executive order on housing, finally issued in November 1962, proved disappointing; it ignored all past discrimination and applied only to houses and apartments financed by the federal government. For many, Kennedy had raised hopes for racial equality that he never fulfilled. But unlike Eisenhower, he had provided presidential leadership for the civil rights movement. His emphasis on executive action gradually paid off, especially in extending voting rights. By early 1964, 40 percent of southern blacks had the franchise, compared to only 28 percent in 1960. Moreover, Kennedy’s sense of caution and restraint, painful and frustrating as it was to African American activists, had proved to be well-founded. Avoiding an early, and possibly fatal, defeat in Congress, he had waited until a national consensus emerged and then had carefully channeled it behind effective legislation. Behaving very much the way Franklin Roosevelt did in guiding the nation into World War II, Kennedy chose to be a fox rather than a lion on civil rights.

The Supreme Court and Reform
 The most active impulse for social change in the early 1960s came from a surprising source: the usually staid and conservative Supreme Court. Under the leadership of Earl Warren, a pragmatic jurist more noted for his political astuteness than his legal scholarship, the Court ventured into new areas. A group of



 liberal judges—especially William O. Douglas, Hugo Black, and William J. Brennan, Jr.—argued for social reform, while advocates of judicial restraint (such as John Marshall Harlan and Felix Frankfurter) fought stubbornly against the new activism. The resignation of Felix Frankfurter in 1962 enabled President Kennedy to appoint Secretary of Labor Arthur Goldberg, a committed liberal, to the Supreme Court. With a clear majority now favoring judicial intervention, the Warren Court issued a series of landmark decisions designed to extend to state and local jurisdictions the traditional rights afforded the accused in federal courts. Thus in Gideon v. Wainwright (1963), Escobedo v. Illinois (1964), and Miranda v. Arizona (1966), the majority decreed that defendants had to be provided lawyers, had to be informed of their constitutional rights, and could not be interrogated or induced to confess to a crime without defense counsel being present. In effect, the Court extended to the poor and the ignorant those constitutional guarantees that had always been available to the rich and to the legally informed—notably hardened criminals. The most far-reaching Warren Court decisions came in the area of legislative reapportionment. In 1962, the Court ruled in Baker v. Carr that Tennessee had to redistribute its legislative seats to give citizens in Memphis equal representation. Subsequent decisions reinforced the ban on rural overrepresentation as the Court proclaimed that places in all legislative bodies, including the House of Representatives, had to be allocated on the basis of “people, not land or trees or pastures.” The principle of “one man, one vote” greatly increased the political power of cities at the expense of rural areas; it also involved the Court directly in the reapportionment process, frequently forcing judges to draw up new legislative and congressional districts. The activism of the Supreme Court stirred up a storm of criticism. The rulings that extended protection to criminals and those accused of subversive activity led some Americans to charge that the Court was encouraging crime and weakening national security. The John Birch Society, an extreme anticommunist group, demanded the impeachment of Chief Justice Warren. The 1962 Engel v. Vitale decision banning school prayer incensed many conservative Americans, who saw the Court as undermining moral values. Legal scholars worried more about the weakening of the Court’s prestige as it became more directly involved in the political process. On balance, however, the Warren Court helped achieve greater social justice by protecting the rights of the underprivileged and by permitting dissent and free expression to flourish.

“Let Us Continue”
 What were Johnson’s domestic priorities and what were his achievements? The New Frontier came to a sudden and violent end on November 22, 1963, when Lee Harvey Oswald assassinated John F. Kennedy as the president rode in a motorcade in downtown Dallas. The shock of losing the young president, who had become a symbol of hope and promise for a whole generation, stunned the entire world. The American people were bewildered by the rapid sequence of events: the brutal killing of their young president; the televised slaying of Oswald by Jack Ruby in the basement of



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 the Dallas police station; the composure and dignity of Kennedy’s widow, Jacqueline, at the ensuing state funeral; and the hurried Warren Commission report, which identified Oswald as the lone assassin. Afterward, critics would charge that Oswald had been part of a vast conspiracy, but at the time, the prevailing national reaction was a numbing sense of loss. Vice President Lyndon B. Johnson moved quickly to fill the vacuum left by Kennedy’s death. Sworn in on board Air Force One as he returned to Washington, Johnson soon met with a stream of world leaders to reassure them of American political stability. Five days after the tragedy in Dallas, Johnson spoke eloquently to a special joint session of Congress. Recalling JFK’s inaugural summons, “Let us begin,” the new president declared, “Today in the moment of new resolve, I would say to all my fellow Americans, ‘Let us continue.”’ Asking Congress to enact Kennedy’s tax and civil rights bills as a tribute to the fallen leader, LBJ concluded, “Let us here highly resolve that John Fitzgerald Kennedy did not live or die in vain.”

Johnson in Action
 Lyndon Johnson suffered from the inevitable comparison with his young and stylish predecessor. LBJ was acutely aware of his own lack of polish; he sought to surround himself with Kennedy advisers and insiders, hoping their sophistication would rub off on him. Johnson’s assets were very real—he possessed an intimate knowledge of Congress, an incredible energy and determination to succeed, and a fierce ego. When a young marine officer tried to direct him to the proper helicopter, saying, “This one is yours,” Johnson replied, “Son, they are all my helicopters.” LBJ’s height and intensity gave him a powerful presence; he dominated any room he entered, and he delighted in using his physical power of persuasion. One Texas politician explained why he had given in to Johnson: “Lyndon got me by the lapels and put his face on top of mine and he talked and talked and talked. I figured it was either getting drowned or joining.” Yet LBJ found it impossible to project his intelligence and vitality to large audiences. Unlike Kennedy, he wilted before the camera, turning his televised speeches into stilted and awkward performances. Trying to belie his reputation as a riverboat gambler, he came across like a foxy grandpa, clever, calculating, and not to be trusted. He lacked Kennedy’s wit and charm, and reporters delighted in describing the way he berated his aides or shocked the nation by baring his belly to show the scar from a recent operation. Whatever his shortcomings in style, however, Johnson possessed far greater ability than Kennedy in dealing with Congress. He entered the White House with more than thirty years of experience in Washington as a legislative aide, congressman, and senator. His encyclopedic knowledge of the legislative process and his shrewd manipulation of individual senators had enabled him to become the most influential Senate majority leader in history. Famed for “the Johnson treatment,” a legendary ability to use personal persuasion to reach his goals, Johnson in fact relied more on his close ties with the Senate’s power brokers—or “whales,” as he called them—than on his exploitation of the “minnows.”

 Above all, Johnson sought consensus. Indifferent to ideology, he had moved easily from New Deal liberalism to oil-and-gas conservatism as his career advanced. He had carefully cultivated Richard Russell of Georgia, leader of the Dixie bloc, but he also had taken Hubert Humphrey, a Minnesota liberal, under his wing. He had performed a balancing act on civil rights, working with the Eisenhower administration on behalf of the 1957 Voting Rights Act, yet carefully weakening it to avoid alienating southern Democrats. When Kennedy dashed Johnson’s own intense presidential ambitions in 1960, LBJ had gracefully agreed to be his running mate and had endured the humiliation of the vice presidency loyally and silently. Suddenly thrust into power, Johnson used his gifts wisely. Citing his favorite scriptural passage from Isaiah, “Come now, and let us reason together, saith the Lord,” he concentrated on securing passage of Kennedy’s tax and civil rights bills in 1964. The tax cut came first. Aware of the power wielded by Senate Finance Committee Chairman Harry Byrd, a Virginia conservative, Johnson astutely lowered Kennedy’s projected $101.5 billion budget for 1965 to $97.9 billion. Although Byrd voted against the tax cut, he let the measure out of his committee, telling Johnson, “I’ll be working for you behind the scenes.” In February, Congress reduced personal income taxes by more than $10 billion, touching off a sustained economic boom. Consumer spending increased by an impressive $43 billion during the next eighteen months, and new jobs opened up at the rate of one million a year. Johnson was even more influential in passing the Kennedy civil rights measure. Staying in the background, he encouraged liberal amendments that strengthened the bill in the House. With Hubert Humphrey leading the floor fight in the Senate, Johnson refused all efforts at compromise, counting on growing public pressure to force northern Republicans to abandon their traditional alliance with southern Democrats. Everett M. Dirksen of Illinois, the GOP leader in the Senate, met repeatedly with Johnson at the White House. When LBJ refused to yield, Dirksen finally led a Republican vote to end a 57-day filibuster. The 1964 Civil Rights Act, signed on July 2, made illegal the segregation of African Americans in public facilities, established an Equal Employment Opportunity Commission to lessen racial discrimination in employment, and protected the voting rights of African Americans. An amendment sponsored by segregationists in an effort to weaken the bill added gender to the prohibition of discrimination in Title VII of the act; in the future, women’s groups would use the clause to secure government support for greater equality in employment and education.

The Election of 1964
 Passage of two key Kennedy measures within six months did not satisfy Johnson who wanted now to win the presidency in his own right. Eager to surpass Kennedy’s narrow victory in 1960, he hoped to win by a great landslide. Searching for a cause of his own, LBJ found one in the issue of poverty. Beginning in the late 1950s, economists had warned that the prevailing affluence disguised a persistent and deep-seated problem of poverty. In 1962, Michael Harrington’s book The Other America attracted national attention. Writing with passion and

“Let Us Continue”


Read the Document




The Civil Rights Act of 1964


 President Johnson applies the “Johnson treatment” to Senator Theodore Francis Green of Rhode Island. A shrewd politician and master of the legislative process, Johnson always knew which votes he could count on, those he couldn’t, and where and how to apply pressure to swing votes his way.

 eloquence, Harrington claimed that nearly one-fifth of the nation, some thirty-five million Americans, lived in poverty. Three groups predominated among the poor—African Americans, the aged, and households headed by women. The problem, Harrington contended, was that the poor were invisible, living in slums or depressed areas such as Appalachia. They were cut off from the educational facilities, medical care, and employment opportunities afforded more affluent Americans. Moreover, poverty was a vicious cycle. The children of the poor were trapped in the same culture of poverty as their parents, living without hope or knowledge of how to enter the mainstream of American life. Johnson quickly took over proposals that Kennedy had been developing and made them his own. In his January 1964 State of the Union address, LBJ announced, “This administration, today, here and now, declares unconditional war on poverty in America.” During the next eight months, Johnson fashioned a comprehensive poverty program under the direction of R. Sargent Shriver, Kennedy’s brother-in-law. The president added $500 million to existing programs to come up with a $1 billion effort that Congress passed in August 1964.

 The new Office of Economic Opportunity (OEO) set up a wide variety of programs, ranging from Head Start for preschoolers to the Job Corps for high school dropouts in need of vocational training. The emphasis was on self-help, with the government providing money and know-how so the poor could reap the benefits of neighborhood day care centers, consumer education classes, legal aid services, and adult remedial reading programs. The level of funding was never high enough to meet the OEO’s ambitious goals, and a controversial attempt to include representatives of the poor in the Community Action Program led to bitter political feuding with city and state officials. Nonetheless, the war on poverty, along with the economic growth provided by the tax cut, helped reduce the ranks of the poor by nearly ten million between 1964 and 1967. The new program established Johnson’s reputation as a reformer in an election year, but he still faced two challenges to his authority. The first was Robert F. Kennedy, the late president’s brother, who continued as attorney general but who wanted to become vice president and Johnson’s eventual successor in the White House. Desperate to prove his ability to succeed without



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 Kennedy help, LBJ commented, “I don’t need that little runt to win” and chose Hubert Humphrey as his running mate. The second challenge was the Republican candidate, Senator Barry Goldwater, an outspoken conservative from Arizona. An attractive and articulate man, Goldwater advocated a rejection of the welfare state and a return to unregulated free enterprise. To Johnson’s delight, Goldwater chose to place ideology ahead of political expediency. The senator spoke out boldly against the Tennessee Valley Authority, denounced Social Security, and advocated a hawkish foreign policy. “In Your Heart, You Know He’s Right,” read the Republican slogan, leading the Democrats to reply, “Yes, Far Right,” and in reference to a careless Goldwater comment about using nuclear weapons, Johnson backers punned, “In Your Heart, You Know He Might.” Johnson stuck carefully to the middle of the road, embracing the liberal reform program—which he now called the Great Society—while emphasizing his concern for balanced budgets and fiscal orthodoxy. The more Goldwater sagged in the polls, the harder Johnson campaigned, determined to achieve his treasured landslide. On election day, LBJ received 61.1 percent of the popular vote and an overwhelming majority in the electoral college; Goldwater carried only Arizona and five states of the Deep South. Equally important, the Democrats achieved huge gains in Congress, controlling the House by a margin of 295 to 140 and the Senate by 68 to 32. Kennedy’s legacy and Goldwater’s candor had enabled Johnson to break the conservative grip on Congress for the first time in a quarter century.

THE ELECTION OF 1964
Candidate Party Popular Vote Electoral Vote Johnson Democratic 43,126,506 Goldwater Republican 27,176,799 
The Triumph of Reform
 LBJ moved quickly to secure his legislative goals. Despite solid majorities in both Houses, including seventy first-term Democrats who had ridden into office on his coattails, Johnson knew he would have to enact the Great Society as swiftly as possible. “You’ve got to give it all you can, that first year,” he told an aide. “Doesn’t matter what kind of majority you come in with. You’ve got just one year when they treat you right, and before they start worrying about themselves.” Johnson gave two traditional Democratic reforms—health care and education—top priority. Aware of strong opposition to a comprehensive medical program, LBJ settled for Medicare, which mandated health insurance under the Social Security program for Americans over age 65, and a supplementary Medicaid program for the indigent. To symbolize the end of a long struggle, Johnson flew to Independence, Missouri, so Truman could witness the ceremonial signing of the Medicare law, which had its origins in Truman’s 1949 health insurance proposal. LBJ overcame the religious hurdle on education by supporting a child-benefit approach, allocating federal money to advance the education of students in parochial as well as public schools. The Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 provided

 more than $1 billion in federal aid, the largest share going to school districts with the highest percentage of impoverished pupils. Civil rights proved to be the most difficult test of Johnson’s leadership. Martin Luther King, Jr., concerned that three million southern blacks were still denied the right to vote, in early 1965 chose Selma, Alabama, as the site for a test case. The white authorities in Selma, led by Sheriff James Clark, used cattle prods and bullwhips to break up the demonstrations. More than two thousand African Americans were jailed. Johnson intervened in March, after TV cameras showed Sheriff Clark’s deputies brutally halting a march from Selma to Montgomery. The president ordered the Alabama National Guard to federal duty to protect the demonstrators, had the Justice Department draw up a new voting rights bill, and personally addressed the Congress on civil rights. “I speak tonight for the dignity of man and the destiny of democracy,” he began. Calling the denial of the right to vote “deadly wrong,” LBJ issued a compelling call to action. “Their cause must be our cause, too. Because it is not just Negroes, but really it is all of us who must overcome the crippling legacy of bigotry and injustice.” Five months later, Congress passed the Voting Rights Act of 1965. Once again Johnson had worked with Senate Republican leader Dirksen to break a southern filibuster and assure passage of a measure. The act banned literacy tests in states and counties in which less than half the population had voted in 1964 and provided for federal registrars in these areas to assure African Americans the franchise. The results were dramatic. In less than a year, 166,000 African Americans were added to the voting rolls in Alabama; African American registration went up 400 percent in Mississippi. By the end of the decade, the percentage of eligible African American voters who had registered had risen from 40 to 65 percent. For the first time since Reconstruction, African Americans had become active participants in southern politics. Before the 89th Congress ended its first session in the fall of 1965, it had passed eighty-nine bills. These included measures to create two new cabinet departments (Transportation and Housing and Urban Affairs); acts to provide for highway safety and to ensure clean air and water; large appropriations for higher education, public housing, and the continuing war on poverty; and sweeping immigration reform legislation. (See the Feature Essay, “Unintended Consequences: The Second Great Migration,” pp. 722–723.) In nine months, Johnson had enacted the entire Democratic reform agenda. The man responsible for this great leap forward, however, had failed to win the public adulation he so deeply desired. His legislative skills had made the most of the opportunities offered by the 1964 Democratic landslide, but the people did not respond to Johnson’s leadership with the warmth and praise they had showered on Kennedy. Reporters continued to portray him as a crude wheeler-dealer; as a maniac who drove around Texas back roads at 90 miles an hour, one hand on the wheel and the other holding a can of beer; or as a bully who picked up his dog by the ears. No one was more aware of this lack of affection than LBJ himself. His public support, he told an aide, is “like a Western river, broad but not deep.” Johnson’s realization of the fleeting nature of his popularity was all too accurate. The dilemmas of the Cold War began to divert his attention from domestic concerns and eventually, in the

Johnson Escalates the Vietnam War


View the Map


Impact of the Voting Rights Act of 1965


Number of Registered Voters


400,000
SOUTH DAKOTA

NEW YORK

MINN. WIS.

Registered
African
American
 voters in 1960

300,000


MICH. PA.

 IOWA

N.J.


 NEBRASKA

200,000


 OHIO

 IND.

 ILLINOIS

Registered
African
American
 voters in 1966

100,000




MD. W.VA.

 KANSAS

50,000
25,000


 MISSOURI

105.0%
 VA.

 KY.

N.C.


TENN. OKLAHOMA

 ARK.

 DEL.

21.6%
S.C.


NEW MEXICO

 ALA. 57.5%

229.3%


 MISS.

34.3%


 GA. 695.4%

LA. TEXAS

278.8%


66.7%


ATLANTIC OCEAN

 FLORIDA

Gulf of Mexico
52.8%


 MEXICO

76.2%








 400 miles

65.6%


 400 kilometers

AFRICAN AMERICAN VOTER REGISTRATION BEFORE AND AFTER PASSAGE OF THE VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965
The percentages shown on the map indicate the increase in African American voter registration between 1960 and 1966. 
 case of Vietnam, would overwhelm him. Yet his legislative achievements were still remarkable. In one brief outburst of reform, he had accomplished more than any president since FDR. Difficulties abroad would dim the luster of the Johnson presidency, but they could not diminish the lasting impact of the Great Society on American life. Federal aid to education, the enactment of Medicare and Medicaid, and, above all, the civil rights acts of 1964 and 1965 changed the nation irrevocably. The aged and the poor now were guaranteed access to medical care; communities saw an infusion of federal funds to improve local education; and African Americans could now begin to attend integrated schools, enjoy public facilities, and gain political power by exercising the right to vote. But even at this moment of triumph for liberal reform, new currents of dissent and rebellion were brewing.

Johnson Escalates the
Vietnam War
 How did Johnson’s Vietnam policy evolve? Lyndon Johnson emphasized continuity in foreign policy just as he had in enacting Kennedy’s domestic reforms. He not only inherited the policy of containment from his fallen predecessor, but

 he shared the same Cold War assumptions and convictions. And, feeling less confident about dealing with international issues, he tended to rely heavily on Kennedy’s advisers—notably Secretary of State Rusk, Secretary of Defense McNamara, and McGeorge Bundy (the national security adviser until he was replaced in 1966 by the even more hawkish Walt Rostow). Johnson had broad exposure to national security affairs. He had served on the Naval Affairs Committee in the House before and during World War II, and as Senate majority leader he had been briefed and consulted regularly on the crises of the 1950s. A confirmed cold warrior, he had also seen in the 1940s the devastating political impact on the Democratic party of the communist triumph in China. “I am not going to lose Vietnam,” he told the American ambassador to Saigon just after taking office in 1963. “I am not going to be the president who saw Southeast Asia go the way China went.” Aware of the problem Castro had caused John Kennedy, LBJ moved firmly to contain communism in the Western Hemisphere. When a military junta overthrew a leftist regime in Brazil, Johnson offered covert aid and open encouragement. He was equally forceful in compelling Panama to restrain rioting aimed at the continued American presence in the Canal Zone. In 1965, to block the possible emergence of a Castro-type government, LBJ sent twenty thousand American troops to the

 Complete the Assignment Unintended Consequences: The Second Great Migration on myhistorylab

Feature
Essay


T


 his is not a revolutionary bill,” President Lyndon Johnson declared when he signed the Immigration Act of 1965 into law. Rarely has a president been so wrong. The changes Congress made in American immigration policy led to a second great migration, larger and even more diverse than the first great migration that took place in the thirty years before World War I. By the end of the century, the second great wave of immigration had profoundly altered the ethnic composition of the United States. The political leaders responsible for changing immigration policy in the 1960s had very different intentions. Focused on removing long-standing inequities in the law, they sought to replace the national origins system, adopted in the 1920s, which favored people from western Europe, with a new set of criteria designed to bring in newcomers with economic skills the United States needed and to reunite broken families. Above all, the architects of change wanted to end the unfair race-based quotas for people of Asian extraction and the evident discrimination against applicants from eastern and southern Europe. Attorney General Robert Kennedy called the national origins quotas “a standing affront to many Americans and to many countries.” At the height of the Cold War, realism seemed to join with idealism in the effort to end a discriminatory immigration policy that smacked of racism. The legislative process, however, often works in mysterious ways. The bill passed by Congress did end the national origins system, as its framers desired, but reversed the new



Unintended Consequences
The Second Great Migration
THE SECOND GREAT MIGRATION: A THEORETICAL EXAMPLE
Student (nonimmigrant) comes for postgraduate studies. After two years completes education and gets job with Labor Certification, thus becoming an immigrant. 






 Becomes citizen after six years and sponsors one brother and one sister



 After one year brother brings wife and one child

After two
 years sister brings husband







 Immigrant now brings wife and two children



 As citizen brings both parents



 As citizen wife brings one parent

 After seven years wife becomes citizen and brings two brothers

Brother
 brings wife and two children



 After two years brother brings wife and one child

 Note: Total is nineteen after original student arrived for postgraduate education ten years earlier. Source: Adapted from David M. Reimer, Still the Golden Door, 2nd ed. (New York: Columbia University Press, 1992), p. 95.

 priorities, giving highest preference to family reunification, and less emphasis to job skills and asylum for refugees. As enacted and later amended, the 1965 Immigration Act set an annual limit of 170,000 for immigrants from Europe, Asia, and Africa, and 120,000 for those

 from Western Hemisphere countries, with a ceiling of 20,000 for any one country. The total, 290,000, would be only slightly larger than the number admitted under the old system. By the end of the 1970s, it was clear that the family preferences,

 which made up nearly 70 percent of the allotted visas, were allowing recent immigrants to bring in large numbers of relatives, instead of reuniting immigrants who had been in the United States for years with their families. The figure, “The Second Great Migration: A Theoretical Example,” shows how one postgraduate student with a nonimmigrant visa, by adroit use of the available family preferences, could easily gain the admission of eighteen relatives in just a decade. Moreover, once resident aliens became citizens, they could bring in relatives—spouses, children under 21, and parents—without regard to visa limits. Two significant developments flowed directly from the Great Society’s immigration policy. First, annual immigration increased steadily from an average of 250,000 in the 1950s to at least one million by the end of the century. In 1990, in an effort to place “immediate relatives” under an effective limit, Congress approved an overall ceiling of just less than 700,000 immigrants a year, except for refugees. But other legislation allowing undocumented workers to gain legal status, as well as an estimated 300,000 illegal immigrants a year, swelled the actual total to more than one million. In effect, the 1965 legislation had led to a quadrupling of

 newcomers entering the United States every year. The other unintended consequence of the 1965 Immigration Act was a rapid shift in the source of the new immigrants. Europe, the traditional place of origin for immigrants, fell from providing 70 percent of newcomers in the 1950s to just 16 percent by the mid1990s. Latin American immigrants rose from 25 to 49 percent of the total, while Asia supplied 32 percent by the end of the century, up from just 6 percent in the 1950s. This change in the countries of origin was as striking as the similar shift from western to eastern Europe in the first great migration. Where once Germany, Great Britain, and Ireland had furnished the majority of newcomers, by 1989 it was Mexico, the Philippines, and Vietnam that led the list, with no European country among the top ten. The result was a growing diversity that promised to make the United States a truly multiethnic society in the twenty-first century. By the 1990s, the number of foreign-born Americans had more than doubled to 10 percent of the population. Hispanic Americans were the most rapidly growing segment, replacing African Americans as the nation’s largest minority in 2001. Asian Americans, although much smaller in

 number, grew at a fast pace and had greater success economically than any other ethnic group. By the end of the century, it was clear that the Immigration Act of 1965 had led to a major shift in the racial and ethnic composition of the United States. The effort to erase past discriminatory and race-based quotas resulted in an unexpected flow of people from Asia and Latin America that ensured the end of traditional European dominance. By 2050, according to Census Bureau projections, the country will be almost evenly divided between non-Hispanic whites and minorities. Social harmony in the twenty-first century will depend on whether the melting pot continues to melt, blending ethnic groups into mainstream America, or whether these groups, as their numbers grow, will shape the society into one that political leaders of the 1960s such as Lyndon Johnson and Robert Kennedy could never have foreseen.

QUESTIONS FOR DISCUSSION 1.
How did the 1965 Immigration Act change immigration policy? 2. Why did the Act lead to a major change in the nation’s ethnic and racial make-up? 




 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 Dominican Republic. Johnson’s flimsy justifications—ranging from the need to protect American tourists to a dubious list of suspected communists among the rebel leaders—served only to alienate liberal critics in the United States, particularly Senate Foreign Relations Committee Chairman J. William Fulbright, a former Johnson favorite. The intervention ended in 1966 with the election of a conservative government. Senator Fulbright, however, continued his criticism of Johnson’s foreign policy by publishing The Arrogance of Power, a biting analysis of the fallacies of containment. Fulbright’s defection symbolized a growing gap between the president and liberal intellectuals; the more LBJ struggled to uphold the Cold War policies he had inherited from Kennedy, the more he found himself under attack from Congress, the media, and the universities.

View the Map


Vietnam War


CHINA BURMA
Major battles or actions 
LAOS NORTH VIETNAM

 THAILAND

TAIWAN
South China Sea 
SOUTH VIETNAM

U.S. and South
 Vietnamese troop movements

 PHILIPPINES

CAMBODIA
Major North Vietnamese supply routes into South Vietnam 
M ALAY S IA
Equator 
 INDONESIA

The Vietnam Dilemma
C H I N A


Hanoi
 U.S. air raids 1966–1968, 1972

Haiphong
 harbor mined, 1972

Gulf of Tonkin


LAOS
Mekong 
R.


Gulf of Tonkin
Incident
Aug. 4, 1964


NORTH VIETNAM

Vientiane


Demilitarized Zone
 (DMZ) 17th Parallel Demarcation Line July 1954

Invasion of Laos
Feb. 6–Mar. 1971
 ail Minh Tr Chi Ho

 It was Vietnam rather than Latin America that became Lyndon Johnson’s obsession and led ultimately to his political downfall. Inheriting an American commitment that dated back to Eisenhower to support an independent South Vietnam, the new president believed he had little choice but to continue Kennedy’s policy in Vietnam. The crisis created by Diem’s overthrow only three weeks before Kennedy’s assassination led to a vacuum of power in Saigon that prevented Johnson from conducting a thorough review and reassessment of the strategic alternatives in Southeast Asia. In 1964, seven different governments ruled South Vietnam; power changed hands three times within one month. According to an American officer, the atmosphere in Saigon “fairly smelled of discontent,” with “workers on strike, students demonstrating, [and] the local press pursuing a persistent campaign of criticism of the new government.” Resisting pressure from the Joint Chiefs of Staff for direct American military involvement, LBJ continued Kennedy’s policy of economic and technical assistance. He sent in seven thousand more military advisers and an additional $50 million in aid. While he insisted it was still up to the Vietnamese themselves to win the war, he expanded American support for covert operations, including amphibious raids on the North. These undercover activities led directly to the Gulf of Tonkin affair. On August 2, 1964, North Vietnamese torpedo boats attacked the Maddox, an American destroyer engaged in electronic intelligence gathering in the Gulf of Tonkin. The attack was prompted by the belief the American ship had been involved in a South Vietnamese raid nearby. The Maddox escaped unscathed, but to show American resolve, the navy sent in another destroyer, the C. Turner Joy. On the evening of August 4, the two destroyers, responding to sonar and radar contacts, opened fire on North Vietnamese gunboats in the area. Johnson ordered retaliatory air strikes on North Vietnamese naval bases. Later investigation indicated that the North Vietnamese gunboats had not launched a second attack on the American ships. The next day, the president asked Congress to pass a resolution authorizing him to take “all necessary measures to repel any armed attack against the forces of the United States and to prevent further aggression.” He did not in fact need this authority; he had already ordered the retaliatory air strike

 THAILAND

CAMBODIA
Invasion of Cambodia Apr. 29–June 29, 1970 
Phnom
Penh


Hue
 Tet offensive Jan. 30–Feb. 1968 My Lai massacre Mar. 16, 1968

SOUTH VIETNAM

South
China
Sea


Saigon
 Tet offensive Jan. 30–Feb. 1968 Surrender, Apr. 30, 1975

Gulf of
Thailand
Mekong
Delta




 100 miles 100 kilometers

SOUTHEAST ASIA AND THE VIETNAM WAR

American
 combat forces in South Vietnam rose from sixteen thousand in 1963 to a half million in 1968, but a successful conclusion to the conflict was no closer.

 without it. Later, critics charged that LBJ wanted a blank check from Congress to carry out the future escalation of the Vietnam War, but such a motive is unlikely. He had already rejected



Johnson Escalates the Vietnam War


 immediate military intervention. In part, he wanted the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution to demonstrate to North Vietnam the American determination to defend South Vietnam at any cost. “The challenge we face in Southeast Asia today,” he told Congress, “is the same challenge that we have faced with courage and that we have met with strength in Greece and Turkey, in Berlin and Korea.” He also wanted to preempt the Vietnam issue from his Republican opponent, Barry Goldwater, who had been advocating a tougher policy. By taking a firm stand on the Gulf of Tonkin incident, Johnson could both impress the North Vietnamese and outmaneuver a political rival at home. Congress responded with alacrity. The House acted unanimously, while only two senators voted against the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution. Johnson appeared to have won a spectacular victory. His standing in the Gallup poll shot up from 42 to 72 percent, and he had effectively blocked Goldwater from exploiting Vietnam as a campaign issue. In the long run, however, this easy victory proved costly. Having used force once against North Vietnam, LBJ was more likely to do so in the future. And although he apparently had no intention of widening the conflict in August 1964, the congressional resolution was phrased broadly enough to enable him to use whatever level of force he wanted—including unlimited military intervention. Above all, when he did wage war in Vietnam, he left himself open to the charge of deliberately misleading Congress. Presidential credibility proved ultimately to be Johnson’s Achilles’ heel; his political downfall began with the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution.

 be needed in 1966 and that American battle deaths could rise as high as five hundred a month (by early 1968, they hit a peak of more than five hundred a week). At the same time, other advisers, most notably Undersecretary of State George Ball, spoke out against military escalation in favor of a political settlement. Warning that the United States was likely to suffer “national humiliation,” Ball told the president that he had “serious doubt that an army of westerners can successfully fight Orientals in an Asian jungle.” Lyndon Johnson was genuinely torn, asking his advisers at one point, “Are we starting something that in two to three years we simply can’t finish?” But he finally decided he had no choice but to persevere in Vietnam. Although he insisted on paring down McNamara’s troop request, LBJ settled on a steady U.S. TROOP LEVELS IN VIETNAM (AS OF DEC. 31 OF EACH YEAR) 536,100

500,000


485,600
475,200


400,000


Escalation
 Full-scale American involvement in Vietnam began in 1965 in a series of steps designed primarily to prevent a North Vietnamese victory. With the political situation in Saigon growing more hopeless every day, the president’s advisers urged the bombing of the North. American air attacks would serve several purposes: They would block North Vietnamese infiltration routes, make Hanoi pay a heavy price for its role, and lift the sagging morale of the South Vietnamese. But most important, as McGeorge Bundy reported after a visit to Pleiku (site of a Vietcong attack on an American base that took nine lives), “Without new U.S. action defeat appears inevitable—probably not in a matter of weeks or perhaps even months, but within the next year or so.” In February 1965, Johnson cited the Pleiku attack in ordering a long-planned aerial bombardment of selected North Vietnamese targets. The air strikes, aimed at impeding the communist supply line and damaging Hanoi’s economy, proved ineffective. In April, Johnson authorized the use of American combat troops in South Vietnam, restricting them to defensive operations intended to protect American air bases. The Joint Chiefs then pressed the president for both unlimited bombing of the North and the aggressive use of American ground forces in the South. In mid-July, Secretary of Defense McNamara recommended sending a hundred thousand combat troops to Vietnam, more than doubling the American forces there. He believed this escalation would lead to a “favorable outcome,” but he also told the president that an additional hundred thousand soldiers might

385,300


334,600


300,000


200,000


184,300


156,800


100,000




3,200


23,300
16,300
11,300


24,200


1960 1961 1962 1963 1964 1965 1966 1967 1968 1969 1970 1971 1972


Source: U.S. Department of Defense




 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 military escalation designed to compel Hanoi to accept a diplomatic solution. In late July, the president permitted a gradual increase in the bombing of North Vietnam and allowed American ground commanders to conduct offensive operations in the South. Most ominously, he approved the immediate dispatch of fifty thousand troops to Vietnam and the future commitment of fifty thousand more. These July decisions formed “an open-ended commitment to employ American military forces as the situation demanded,” wrote historian George Herring, and they were “the closest thing to a formal decision for war in Vietnam.” Convinced that withdrawal would destroy American credibility before the world and that an invasion of the North would lead to World War III, Johnson opted for large-scale but limited military intervention. Moreover, LBJ feared the domestic consequences of either extreme. A pullout could cause a massive political backlash at home, as conservatives condemned him for betraying South Vietnam to communism. All-out war, however, would mean the end of his social programs. Once Congress focused on the conflict, he explained to biographer Doris Kearns, “that bitch of a war” would destroy “the woman I really loved—the Great Society.” So he settled for a limited war, committing a half million American troops to battle in Southeast Asia, all the while pretending it was a minor engagement and refusing to ask the American people for the support and sacrifice required for victory. Lyndon Johnson was not solely responsible for the Vietnam War. He inherited both a policy that assumed Vietnam was a vital national interest and a deteriorating situation in Saigon that demanded a more active American role. Truman, Eisenhower, and Kennedy had taken the United States deep into the Vietnam maze; it was Johnson’s fate to have to find a way out. But LBJ bears full responsibility for the way he tried to resolve his dilemma. The failure to confront the people with the stark choices the nation faced in Vietnam, the insistence on secrecy and deceit, and the refusal to acknowledge that he had committed the United States to a dangerous military involvement were Johnson’s sins in Vietnam. His lack of self-confidence in foreign policy and fear of domestic reaction led directly to his undoing.

Stalemate
 For the next three years, Americans waged an intensive war in Vietnam and succeeded only in preventing a communist victory. American bombing of the North proved ineffective. The rural, undeveloped nature of the North Vietnamese economy meant there were few industrial targets; a political refusal to bomb the main port of Haiphong allowed Soviet and Chinese arms to flow freely into the country. Nor were the efforts to destroy supply lines any more successful. American planes pounded the Ho Chi Minh Trail that ran down through Laos and Cambodia, but the North Vietnamese used the jungle canopy effectively to hide their shipments and their massive efforts to repair damaged roads and bridges. In fact, the American air attacks, with their inadvertent civilian casualties, gave North Vietnam a powerful propaganda weapon, which it used to sway world opinion against the United States. The war in the South went no better. Despite the steady increase in American ground forces, from 184,000 in late 1965 to

 more than 500,000 by early 1968, the Vietcong still controlled much of the countryside. The search-and-destroy tactics employed by the American commander, General William Westmoreland, proved ill suited to the situation. The Vietcong, aided by North Vietnamese regulars, were waging a war of insurgency, avoiding fixed positions and striking from ambush. In a vain effort to destroy the enemy, Westmoreland used superior American firepower wantonly, devastating the countryside, causing many civilian casualties, and driving the peasantry into the arms of the guerrillas. Inevitably, these tactics led to the slaughter of innocent civilians, most notably at the hamlet of My Lai. In March 1968, an American company led by Lieutenant William Calley, Jr., killed more than two hundred unarmed villagers. The main premise of Westmoreland’s strategy was to wage a war of attrition that would finally reach a “crossover point” when communist losses each month would be greater than the number of new troops they could recruit. He hoped to lure the Vietcong and the North Vietnamese regulars into pitched battles in which American firepower would inflict heavy casualties. But soon it was the communists who were deciding where and when the fighting would take place, provoking American attacks in remote areas of South Vietnam that favored the defenders and made Westmoreland pay heavily in American lives for the communist losses. By the end of 1967, the nearly half million American troops Johnson had sent to Vietnam had failed to defeat the enemy. At best, LBJ had only achieved a bloody stalemate that gradually turned the American people against a war they had once eagerly embraced.

Years of Turmoil
 Why were there protests during the 1960s? The Vietnam War became the focal point for a growing movement of youthful protest that made the 1960s the most turbulent decade of the twentieth century. Disenchantment with conventional middle-class values, a rapid increase in college enrollments as a result of the post–World War II baby boom, a reaction against the crass materialism of the affluent society—with its endless suburbs and shopping malls—all led American youth to embrace an alternative lifestyle based on the belief that people are “sensitive, searching, poetic, and capable of love.” They were ready to create a counterculture. The agitation of the 1960s was at its height between 1965 and 1968, the years that marked the escalation of the Vietnam War. Disturbances on college campuses reflected growing discontent in other parts of society, from the urban ghettos to the lettuce fields of the Southwest. All who felt disadvantaged and dissatisfied— students, African Americans, Hispanics, Native Americans, women, hippies—took to the streets to give vent to their feelings.

The Student Revolt
 The first sign of student rebellion came in the fall of 1964 at the prestigious University of California at Berkeley. A small group of radical students resisted university efforts to deny them a place to solicit volunteers and funds for off-campus causes. Forming the Free Speech movement, they struck back by occupying

Years of Turmoil




 administration buildings and blocking the arrest of a nonstudent class. But like the flappers of the 1920s, the protesters set the tone for protester. For the next two months the campus was in turmoil. an entire era and left a lasting impression on American society. In the end, the protesters won the rights of free speech and association that they championed. Their hero was Mario Savio, a Protesting the Vietnam War student who had eloquently summed up the cause by likening the university to a great machine and telling others, “You’ve got to put The most dramatic aspect of the youthful rebellion came in your bodies upon the gears, and upon the wheels, upon the levers, opposing the Vietnam War. The first student “teach-ins” began upon all the apparatus, and you’ve got to make it stop.” at the University of Michigan in March 1965; soon they spread The Free Speech movement at Berkeley offered many insights into the causes of campus unrest. It was fueled in part by student suspicion of an Watch the Video Protests Against the Vietnam War older, depression-born generation that viewed affluence as the answer to all problems. Unable to exert much influence on the power structure that directed the consumer society, the students turned on the university. They viewed higher education as the faithful servant of a corporate culture: The university trained hordes of technicians, harbored research laboratories that perfected dreadful weapons, and used IBM punch cards to regiment students. The feeling of powerlessness that underlay the Berkeley riots was best revealed by a protester carrying a sign that read, “I am a UC student. Please don’t bend, fold, spindle, or mutilate me.” Student protest found its full expression in the explosive growth of the Students for a Democratic Society (SDS). Founded in Port Huron, Michigan, in 1962, this radical organization wanted to rid American society of poverty, racism, and violence. Although the SDS embraced many traditional liberal reforms, such as expanded public housing and comprehensive health insurance, its founders advocated a new approach called participatory democracy. In contrast to both liberalism and oldstyle socialism, the SDS sought salvation through the individual rather than the group. Personal control of one’s life and destiny, not the creation of new bureaucracies, was the hallmark of the New Left. In the next few years, the SDS grew phenomenally. Spurred on by the Vietnam War and massive campus unrest, the SDS could count more than a hundred thousand followers and was responsible for disruptions at nearly a thousand colleges in 1968. Yet its very emphasis on the individual and its fear of bureaucracy left it leaderless and subject to division and disunity. By 1970, a split between factions, some of which were given to violence, led to its complete demise. The meteoric career of the SDS symbolized the turbulence of the 1960s. For a brief time, it seemed as though the nation’s youth had gone berserk, indulging in a wave of experimentation with drugs, sex, and rock music. Older Americans believed that all the nation’s traditional values, from the Puritan work ethic to the Antiwar demonstrators protest in Central Park, New York City on April 15, 1967. family, were under attack. Not all American youth Four hundred thousand peace demonstrators, with Martin Luther King, Jr. leading the joined in the cultural insurgency; the rebellion was procession, marched from Central Park to the United Nations to demand a halt to the American bombing of North Vietnam. generally limited to children of the upper-middle



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 to campuses across the nation. More than twenty thousand protesters, under SDS auspices, gathered in Washington in April to listen to entertainers Joan Baez and Judy Collins sing antiwar songs. “End the War in Vietnam Now, Stop the Killing” read the signs. One of the great ironies of the Vietnam War was the system of student draft deferments, which enabled most of those enrolled in college to avoid military service. As a result, the children of the well-to-do, who were more likely to attend college, were able to escape the draft. One survey revealed that men from disadvantaged families, including a disproportionately large number of African and Hispanic Americans, were twice as likely to be drafted and engage in combat in Vietnam as those from more privileged backgrounds. Consequently, a sense of guilt led many college activists who were safe from Vietnam because of their student status to take the lead in denouncing an unjust war. As the fighting in Southeast Asia intensified in 1966 and 1967, the protests grew larger and the slogans more extreme. “Hey, Hey, LBJ, how many kids did you kill today?” chanted students as they proclaimed, “Hell, no, we won’t go!” At the Pentagon in October 1967, more than a hundred thousand demonstrators—mainly male students but housewives, teachers, and young professionals as well—confronted a cordon of military policemen guarding the heart of the nation’s war machine. The climax came in the spring of 1968. Driven by both opposition to the war and concern for social justice, the SDS and African American radicals at Columbia University joined forces in April. They seized five buildings, effectively paralyzing one of the country’s leading colleges. After eight days of tension, the New York City police regained control. The brutal repression quickened the pace of protest elsewhere. Students held sit-ins and marches at more than one hundred colleges, from Cheyney State in Pennsylvania to Northwestern in Illinois. The students failed to stop the war, but they did succeed in gaining a voice in their education. University administrations allowed undergraduates to sit on faculty curriculum-planning committees and gave up their once rigid control of dormitory and social life. But the students’ greatest impact lay outside politics and the campus. They spawned a cultural uprising that transformed the manners and morals of America.

The Cultural Revolution
 In contrast to the elitist political revolt of the SDS, the cultural rebellion by youth in the 1960s was pervasive. Led by college students, young people challenged the prevailing adult values in clothing, hairstyles, sexual conduct, work habits, and music. Blue jeans and love beads took the place of business suits and wristwatches; long hair and unkempt beards for men, bare feet and bralessness for women became a new uniform of protest. Families gave way to communes for the “hippies” and “flower children” of the 1960s. A “summer of love” in San Francisco’s Haight Ashbury district in 1967 drew hundreds of thousands of young men and women from all across the country to sample free sex, free drugs, and free medical care (the last required to deal with the former two). Underground newspapers proliferated,

 rejecting the values and opinions of the media establishment. Experimental art and film smashed the models of highbrow art and Hollywood. Music became the touchstone of the counterculture. Folksingers such as Joan Baez and Bob Dylan, popular for their songs of social protest in the mid-1960s, gave way first to rock groups such as the Beatles, whose lyrics were often suggestive of drug use, and then to “acid rock” as symbolized by the Grateful Dead. The climactic event of the counterculture during the decade came at the Woodstock concert at Bethel in upstate New York when 400,000 young people indulged in a three-day festival of rock music, drug experimentation, and public sexual activity. Former Harvard psychology professor Timothy Leary encouraged youth to join him in trying out the drug scene. Millions accepted his invitation to “tune in, turn on, drop out” literally, as they experimented with marijuana and with LSD, a new and dangerous chemical hallucinogen. The ultimate expression of insurgency was the Yippie movement, led by Jerry Rubin and Abbie Hoffman. Shrewd buffoons who mocked the consumer culture, they delighted in capitalizing on the mood of social protest to win attention. Once, when testifying before a congressional committee investigating internal subversion, Rubin dressed as a Revolutionary War soldier; Hoffman appeared in the gallery of the New York Stock Exchange in 1967, raining money down on the cheering brokers below.

“Black Power”
 The civil rights movement, which had spawned the mood of protest in the 1960s, fell on hard times later in the decade. The legislative triumphs of 1964 and 1965 were relatively easy victories over southern bigotry; now the movement faced the far more complex problem of achieving economic equality in the cities of the North, where more than half of the nation’s African Americans lived in poverty. The civil rights movement had raised the expectations of urban African Americans for improvement; frustration mounted as they failed to experience any significant economic gain. The first sign of trouble came in the summer of 1964, when African American teenagers in Harlem and Rochester, New York, rioted. The next summer, a massive outburst of rage and destruction swept over the Watts area of Los Angeles as the inhabitants burned buildings and looted stores. Riots in the summer of 1966 were less destructive, but in 1967 the worst ones yet took place in Newark and in Detroit, where forty-three were killed and thousands were injured. The mobs attacked the shops and stores, expressing a burning grievance against a consumer society from which they were excluded by their poverty. Th e civil rights coalition fell apart, a victim of both its legislative success and economic failure. Black militants took over the leadership of the Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee (SNCC); they disdained white help and even reversed Martin Luther King’s insistence on nonviolence. The SNCC’s new leader, Stokely Carmichael, told blacks they should seize power in those parts of the South where they outnumbered whites. “I am not going to beg the white man for

Years of Turmoil


 anything I deserve,” he said, “I’m going to take it.” Soon his calls for “black power” became a rallying cry for more militant blacks who advocated the need for African Americans to form “our own institutions, credit unions, co-ops, political parties” and even write “our own history.” Others went further than calls for ethnic separation. H. Rap Brown, who replaced Carmichael as the leader of the SNCC in 1967, told an African American crowd in Cambridge, Maryland, to “get your guns” and “burn this town down”; Huey Newton, one of the founders of the militant Black Panther party, proclaimed, “We make the statement, quoting from Chairman Mao, that political power comes through the barrel of a gun.” King suffered the most from this extremism. His denunciation of the Vietnam War cost him the support of the Johnson administration and alienated him from the more conservative civil rights groups such as the NAACP and the Urban League. He finally seized on poverty as the proper enemy for attack, but before he could lead his Poor People’s March on Washington in 1968, he was assassinated in Memphis in early April. Both blacks and whites realized the nation had lost its most eloquent voice for racial harmony. His tragic death elevated King to the status of a martyr, but it also led to one last outbreak of urban violence. African Americans exploded in angry riots in 125 cities across the nation; the worst rioting took place in Washington, D.C., where buildings were set on fire within a few blocks of the White House. “It was as if the city were being abandoned to an invading army,” wrote a British journalist. “Clouds of smoke hung over the Potomac, evoking memories of the London blitz.” Yet there was a positive side to the emotions engendered by black nationalism. Leaders urged African Americans to take pride in their ethnic heritage, to embrace their blackness as a positive value. African Americans began to wear Afro hairstyles and dress in dashikis, emphasizing their African roots. Students began to demand new black studies programs in the colleges; the word Negro—identified with white supremacy of the past—virtually disappeared from usage overnight, replaced by the favored Afro-American or black. Singer James Brown best expressed the sense of racial identity: “Say It Loud—I’m Black and I’m Proud.”



 grape pickers and lettuce workers in California into the National Farm Workers Association (NFWA). Chávez appealed to ethnic nationalism in mobilizing Mexican American field hands to strike against grape growers in the San Joaquin Valley in 1965. A national boycott of grapes by Mexican Americans and their sympathizers among the young people of the counterculture led to a series of hard-fought victories over the growers. The five-year struggle resulted in a union victory in 1970, but at an enormous cost— 95 percent of the farmworkers involved had lost their homes and their cars. Nevertheless, Chávez succeeded in raising the hourly wage of farmworkers in California to $3.53 by 1977 (it had been $1.20 in 1965). Chávez’s efforts helped spark an outburst of ethnic consciousness among Mexican Americans that swept through the urban barrios of the Southwest. Mexican American leaders campaigned for bilingual programs and improved educational opportunities. Young activists began to call themselves Chicanos, which had previously been a derogatory term, and to take pride in their cultural heritage; in 1968, they succeeded in establishing the first Mexican American studies program at California State College at Los Angeles. Campus leaders called for reform, urging high school students to insist on improvements. Heeding such appeals, nearly ten thousand students at East Los Angeles high schools walked out of class in March 1968. These walkouts sparked similar movements in San Antonio, Texas, and Phoenix, Arizona, and led to the introduction of

Ethnic Nationalism
 Other groups quickly emulated the African American phenomenon. Native Americans decried the callous use of their identity as football mascots; in response, universities such as Stanford changed their symbols. Puerto Ricans demanded their history be included in school and college texts. Polish, Italian, and Czech groups insisted on respect for their nationalities. Congress acknowledged these demands with passage of the Ethnic Heritage Studies Act of 1972. Instead of trying to melt all groups down into a standard American type, Congress now gave what one sponsor of the measure called “official recognition to ethnicity as a positive constructive force in our society today.” Mexican Americans were in the forefront of the ethnic groups that became active in the 1970s. The primary impulse came from the efforts of César Chávez to organize the poorly paid

 In March 1966, César Chávez, shown here talking with workers, led striking grape pickers on a 250-mile march from Delano, California, to the state capital at Sacramento to dramatize the plight of the migrant farmworkers. With the slogan “God is beside you on the picket line,” the march took on the character of a religious pilgrimage.



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 women to fix the food and type the communiqués while the men made the decisions. Read the Document National Organization for Women, Statement of Understandably, women soon realized that Purpose (1966) they could only achieve respect and equality by mounting their own protest. In some ways, the position of women in American society was worse in the 1960s than it had been in the 1920s. After forty years, a lower percentage of women were enrolled in the nation’s colleges and professional schools. Women were still relegated to stereotyped occupations such as nursing and teaching; there were few female lawyers and even fewer women doctors. And gender roles, as portrayed on television commercials, continued to call for the husband to be the breadwinner and the wife to be the homemaker. Betty Friedan was one of the first to seize on the sense of grievance and discrimination that developed among white middle-class women in the 1960s. The beginning of the effort to raise women’s consciousness was her 1963 book, The Feminine Mystique. Calling the American home “a comfortable concentration camp,” she attacked the prevailing view that women were completely contented with their housekeeping and child-rearing tasks, claiming that housewives had no selfesteem and no sense of identity. “I’m a server of food and putter on of pants and a bedmaker,” a mother of four told Friedan, “somebody who can be called on when you want something. But who am I?” The 1964 Civil Rights Act helped women attack economic inequality head-on by making it illegal to discriminate in employment on the basis of gender. Women filed suit for equal wages, demanded that companies provide day care for their infants and preschool children, and entered politics to lobby against laws that—in the guise of protection of a weaker gender—were unfair to women. As the women’s liberation movement grew, its advocates began to attack laws banning abortion and waged a campaign to toughen the enforcement of rape laws. The women’s movement met with many Betty Friedan was a writer and a major American feminist during the 1960s and 1970s. She was of the same obstacles as other protest groups the founder of the National Organization for Women (NOW), and her book The Feminist Mystique in the 1960s. The moderate leadership of helped ignite the “second wave” of American feminism in the 20th century. the National Organization for Women bilingual programs in grade schools and the hiring of more (NOW) , founded by Betty Friedan in 1966, soon was chalChicano teachers at all levels. lenged by those with more extreme views. Ti-Grace Atkinson and Susan Brownmiller attacked revered institutions—the family and the home—and denounced sexual intercourse with men, Women’s Liberation calling it a method of male domination. Many women were Active as they were in the civil rights and antiwar movements, repelled by the harsh rhetoric of the extremists and expressed women soon learned that the male leaders of these causes satisfaction with their lives. But despite these disagreements, were little different from corporate executives—they expected most women supported the effort to achieve equal status with

The Return of Richard Nixon


 men, and in 1972, Congress responded by voting to send the Equal Rights Amendment to the state legislatures for ratification.

The Return of Richard Nixon
 How did the Vietnam War influence American politics? The turmoil of the 1960s reached a crescendo in 1968 as the American people responded to the two dominant events of the decade—the war in Vietnam and the cultural insurgency at home. In an election marked by a series of bizarre events, including riots and an assassination, Richard Nixon staged a remarkable comeback to win the post denied him in 1960.

Vietnam Undermines Lyndon Johnson
 A controversial Vietcong offensive in early 1968 proved to be the decisive event in breaking the stalemate in Vietnam and driving Lyndon Johnson from office. Using deceptive tactics, the North Vietnamese began a prolonged siege of an American marine base at Khe Sanh, deep in the northern interior. Fearing another Dien Bien Phu, Westmoreland rushed in reinforcements, sending more than 40 percent of all American infantry and armor battalions into the two northernmost provinces of South Vietnam. The Vietcong then used the traditional lull in the fighting at Tet, the lunar New Year, to launch a surprise attack in the heavily populated cities. Beginning on January 30, 1968, the Vietcong struck at thirty-six of the forty-four provincial capitals. The most daring raid came at the American embassy compound in Saigon. Although the guerrillas were unable to penetrate the embassy proper, for six hours television cameras caught the dramatic battle that ensued in the courtyard before military police finally overcame the attackers. Although caught off guard, American and South Vietnamese forces succeeded in repulsing the Tet offensive quickly everywhere except in Hue, the old imperial capital, which was retaken only after three weeks of heavy fighting that left this beautiful city, in the words of one observer, “a shattered, stinking hulk, its streets choked with rubble and rotting bodies.” Tet proved to be the turning point of the Vietnam War. Although the communists failed to win control of the cities and suffered heavy losses, they still held on to most of the rural areas and had scored an impressive political victory. For months, President Johnson had been telling the American people the war was almost over and victory was in sight; suddenly it appeared to be nearly lost. CBS-TV newscaster Walter Cronkite took a quick trip to Saigon to find out what had happened. Horrified at what he saw, he exclaimed to his guides, “What the hell is going on? I thought we were winning the war.” He returned home to tell the American people, “It seems now more certain than ever that the bloody experience of Vietnam is to end in a stalemate.” President Johnson reluctantly came to the same conclusion after the Joint Chiefs of Staff requested an additional 205,000 troops to achieve victory in Vietnam following the Tet offensive. He began to listen to his new secretary of defense, Clark Clifford, who had replaced Robert McNamara in January 1968. In midMarch, after receiving advice from the “wise men,” a group of experienced cold warriors that included such illustrious figures



 as Dean Acheson and Omar Bradley, the president decided to limit the bombing of North Vietnam in an effort to open up peace negotiations with Hanoi. In a speech to the nation on Sunday evening, March 31, 1968, Johnson outlined his plans for a new effort at ending the war peacefully and then concluded by saying, as proof of his sincerity, “I shall not seek, and I will not accept, the nomination of my party for another term as your president.” In the fourteen years since the siege of Dien Bien Phu, American policy had gone full cycle in Vietnam. Even though Eisenhower had decided against using force to rescue the French, his commitment to the Diem regime in Saigon had led eventually to American military involvement on a massive scale. Three years of inconclusive fighting and a steadily mounting loss of American lives had disillusioned the American people and finally cost Lyndon Johnson the presidency. And the full price the nation would have to pay for its folly in Southeast Asia was still unknown—the Vietnam experience would continue to cast a shadow over American life for years to come.

The Democrats Divide
 Lyndon Johnson’s withdrawal from the presidential race after the Tet offensive set the tone for the 1968 election. LBJ’s decision had come in response to political as well as military realities. By 1966, the antiwar movement had spread from the college campuses to Capitol Hill. Chairman J. William Fulbright gave the protests a new respectability when his Senate Foreign Relations Committee held probing hearings on the war, broadcast on television to the entire country. Johnson began to feel like a prisoner in the White House, since in his infrequent public appearances he was hounded by larger and larger groups of antiwar demonstrators, whose taunts and jeers wounded him. The essentially leaderless protest against the war had taken on a new quality on January 3, 1968, when Senator Eugene McCarthy, a Democrat from Minnesota, announced he would challenge LBJ for the party’s presidential nomination. Intellectual, cool, and aloof, McCarthy raised the banner of idealism, telling audiences, “Whatever is morally necessary must be made politically possible.” College students flocked to his campaign, shaving their beards and cutting their hair to be “clean for Gene.” In the New Hampshire primary in early March, the nation’s earliest political test, McCarthy shocked the political experts by coming within a few thousand votes of defeating President Johnson. McCarthy’s strong showing in New Hampshire led Robert Kennedy, who had been weighing the risks in challenging Johnson, to enter the presidential race. Elected senator from New York in 1964, Bobby Kennedy had become an effective voice for the disadvantaged, as well as an increasingly severe critic of the Vietnam War. Unlike McCarthy, whose appeal was largely limited to uppermiddle-class whites and college students, Kennedy attracted strong support among blue-collar workers, African Americans, Chicanos, and other minorities who formed the nucleus of the continuing New Deal coalition. Lyndon Johnson’s dramatic withdrawal caused an uproar in the Democratic party. With Johnson’s tacit backing and strong support from party regulars and organized labor, Vice President Hubert H. Humphrey immediately declared his candidacy.



 CHAPTER 30

THE TURBULENT SIXTIES

 Humphrey, a classic Cold War liberal who had worked equally hard for social reform at home and American expansion abroad, was totally unacceptable to the antiwar movement. Accordingly, he decided to avoid the primaries and work for the nomination within the framework of the party. Kennedy and McCarthy, the two antiwar candidates, were thus left to compete in the spring primaries, requiring agonizing choices among those who desired change. Kennedy won everywhere except in Oregon, but his narrow victory in California ended in tragedy when a Palestinian immigrant, Sirhan Sirhan, assassinated him in a Los Angeles hotel. With his strongest opponent struck down, Hubert Humphrey had little difficulty at the Chicago convention. Backed by that city’s political boss, Mayor Richard Daley, the vice president relied on party leaders to defeat an antiwar resolution and win the nomination on the first ballot by a margin of more than two to one. Humphrey’s triumph was marred by violence outside the heavily guarded convention hall. Radical groups had urged their members to come to Chicago to agitate; the turnout was relatively small but included many who were ready to provoke the authorities in their despair over the convention’s outcome. Epithets and cries of “pigs” brought on a savage response from Daley’s police. “The cops had one thing on their mind,” commented journalist Jimmy Breslin. “Club and then gas, club and then gas, club and then gas.” The bitter fumes of tear gas hung in the streets for days afterward; the battered heads and bodies of demonstrators and innocent bystanders alike flooded the city’s hospital emergency rooms. What an official investigation later termed a “police riot” marred Humphrey’s nomination and made a sad mockery out of his call for “the politics of joy.” The Democratic party itself had become the next victim of the Vietnam War.

The Republican Resurgence
 The primary beneficiary of the Democratic debacle was Richard Nixon. Written off as politically dead after his unsuccessful race for governor of California in 1962, Nixon had slowly rebuilt his place within the party by working loyally for Barry Goldwater in 1964 and for GOP congressional candidates two years later. Positioning himself squarely in the middle, he quickly became the front-runner for the Republican nomination. At the GOP convention in Miami Beach, Nixon won an easy first-ballot nomination and chose Maryland governor Spiro Agnew as his running mate. Agnew, little known on the national scene, had won the support of conservatives by taking a strong stand against African American rioters. In the fall campaign, Nixon opened up a wide lead by avoiding controversy and reaping the benefit of discontent with the Vietnam War. He played the peace issue shrewdly, appearing to advocate an end to the conflict without ever taking a definite stand. The United States should “end the war and win the peace,” he declared, hinting he had a secret formula for peace but never revealing what it was. Above all, he chose the role of reconciler for a nation torn by emotion, a leader who promised to bring a divided country together again.

Election of 1968
Electoral Vote by State


Popular Vote


REPUBLICAN
Richard M. Nixon 


31,770,237


DEMOCRATIC
Hubert H. Humphrey 


31,270,533


AMERICAN INDEPENDENT
George C. Wallace 


9,906,141
239,908


MINOR PARTIES

73,186,819












































 HAWAII



WASH., D.C.











 ALASKA





























 Humphrey, in contrast, found himself hounded by antiwar demonstrators who heckled him constantly. He walked a tightwire, desperate for the continued support of President Johnson but handicapped by LBJ’s stubborn refusal to end all bombing of North Vietnam. Only when he broke with Johnson in late September by announcing that if elected he would “stop the bombing of North Vietnam as an acceptable risk for peace” did his campaign begin to gain momentum. Unfortunately for Humphrey, a third-party candidate cut deeply into the normal Democratic majority. George C. Wallace had first gained national attention as the racist governor of Alabama whose motto was “Segregation now . . . segregation tomorrow … segregation forever.” In 1964, he had shown surprising strength in Democratic primaries in northern states. By attacking both black leaders and their liberal white allies, Wallace appealed to the sense of powerlessness among the urban working classes. “Liberals, intellectuals, and longhairs have run the country for too long,” Wallace told his followers. “When I get to Washington,” he promised, “I’ll throw all these phonies and their briefcases into the Potomac.” Running on the ticket of the American Independent Party, Wallace was a close third in the September polls, gaining support from more than 20 percent of the electorate. But as the election neared, his following declined. Humphrey continued to gain, especially after Johnson agreed in late October to end all bombing of North Vietnam. By the first week in November, the outcome was too close for the experts to call.

Conclusion: The End of an Era


 Nixon won the election with the smallest share of the popular vote of any winning candidate since 1916. But he swept a broad band of states from Virginia and the Carolinas through the Midwest to the Pacific for a clear-cut victory in the electoral college. Humphrey held on to the urban Northeast; Wallace took just five states in the Deep South, but his heavy inroads into blue-collar districts in the North shattered the New Deal coalition.

Conclusion: The End of an Era
 The election of 1968 was a repudiation of the politics of protest and the cultural insurgency of the mid-1960s. The combined popular vote for Nixon and Wallace, 56.5 percent of the electorate, signified there was a silent majority that was fed up with violence and confrontation. A growing concern over psychedelic drugs,



 rock music, long hair, and sexual permissiveness had offset the usual Democratic advantage on economic issues and led to the election of a Republican president. Richard Nixon’s victory marked the end of an era with the passing of two concepts that had guided American life since the 1930s. First, the liberal reform impulse, which reached its zenith with the Great Society legislation in 1965, had clearly run its course. Civil rights, Medicare, and federal aid to education would continue in place, but Nixon’s election signaled a strong reaction against the growth of federal power. At the same time, the Vietnam fiasco spelled the end of an activist foreign policy that had begun with American entry into World War II. Containment, so successful in protecting western Europe against the Soviet threat, had proved a disastrous failure when applied on a global scale. The last three decades of the twentieth century would witness a struggle to replace outmoded liberal internationalism with new policies at home and abroad.



 CHAPTER 30

CHAPTER REVIEW

Study
 y Resources Take the Study Plan for Chapter 30 The Turbulent Sixties on MyHistoryLab

TIME LINE 1961 JFK
establishes Peace Corps (March); U.S.-backed 
 1965 LBJ commits fifty thousand American troops to com-

 Bay of Pigs invasion crushed by Cubans (April) President Kennedy forces U.S. Steel to roll back price hike (April); Cuban missile crisis takes world to brink of nuclear war (October) United States, Great Britain, and USSR sign Limited Nuclear Test Ban treaty (August); JFK assassinated; Lyndon B. Johnson sworn in as president (November)

 bat in Vietnam (July); Congress enacts Medicare and Medicaid (July) National Organization for Women (NOW) formed Israel wins Six-Day War in Middle East (June); Riots in Detroit kill forty-three, injure two thousand, leave five thousand homeless (July) Vietcong launch the Tet offensive (January); Johnson announces he will not seek reelection (March); Martin Luther King, Jr., assassinated in Memphis (April); Robert Kennedy assassinated in Los Angeles (June)



 1964 President Johnson declares war on poverty (January); Congress overwhelmingly passes Gulf of Tonkin Resolution (August); Johnson wins presidency in landslide (November)

CHAPTER REVIEW
Kennedy Intensifies the Cold War 
Johnson Escalates the Vietnam War
C H I N A


 How did the Cold War intensify under Kennedy?

 How did Johnson’s Vietnam policy evolve?

Haiphong
 harbor mined, 1972

 Johnson seized upon an ambiguous incident in the Gulf of Tonkin to persuade Congress to grant him authority to escalate American involvement in Vietnam. He initiated a major troop buildup and air attacks against North Vietnam. The escalation produced only a bloody stalemate. (p. 721) Gulf of Tonkin

LAOS
Mekong 
R.


Gulf of Tonkin
Incident
Aug. 4, 1964


NORTH VIETNAM

Vientiane


Demilitarized Zone
 (DMZ)

 17th Demarc July

Invasion of Laos
Feb. 6–Mar. 1971


Hue
 Tet offensive Jan. 30–Feb. 1968

C
Ho


 Kennedy increased American support to South Vietnam and pressured the Cuban government of Fidel Castro. Kennedy raised troop levels in Vietnam and authorized the overthrow of Diem. He ordered a covert operation against Castro at the Bay of Pigs (which failed) and delivered an ultimatum to the Soviets to pull their missiles out of Cuba (which succeeded). (p. 708)

Hanoi
 U.S. air raids 1966–1968, 1972

HA IL A ND

Years of Turmoil
The New Frontier at Home
 Why were there protests in the 1960s? What was the “New Frontier,” and what did it accomplish? The “New Frontier” was Kennedy’s domestic program, and on its most important issue, civil rights, it achieved mixed results. Kennedy supported civil rights, but hesitantly. Black activists, especially Martin Luther King, Jr., pushed the cause of racial equality farther than Kennedy was prepared to take it. (p. 713)

 During the 1960s, students protested the war in Vietnam. Many young people also rebelled against the values of their parents, experimenting with new kinds of music, clothing styles, and drugs. Black militants demanded faster progress toward racial equality, and sometimes employed violence to achieve it. César Chávez improved the lot of Mexican American farmworkers. Feminists sought greater equality for women. (p. 726)

“Let Us Continue”


The Return of Richard Nixon


 What were Johnson’s domestic priorities, and what were his achievements?

239,90


MINOR PARTIES

73,186,81




















 Johnson’s “Great Society” included the 1964 Civil Rights Act and the 1965 Voting Rights Act; Medicare, which provided health insurance for the elderly; and federal aid to education. (p. 717)









 How did the Vietnam War influence American politics?











 Johnson’s failure in Vietnam discredited his administration and produced desire for change. He abandoned plans to run for reelection in 1968, opening the door to Richard Nixon. (p. 731)















 ASKA



 WAII



















STUDY RESOURCES



KEY TERMS AND DEFINITIONS
New Frontier President John F. Kennedy’s program to revitalize the stagnant economy and enact reform legislation in education, health care, and civil rights. p. 708 Bay of Pigs In April 1961, a group of Cuban exiles, organized and supported by the CIA, landed on the southern coast of Cuba in an effort to overthrow Fidel Castro. When the invasion ended in disaster, President Kennedy took full responsibility for it. p. 710 Cuban missile crisis In October 1962, the United States and the Soviet Union came close to nuclear war when President John F. Kennedy insisted that Nikita Khrushchev remove the 42 missiles he had secretly deployed in Cuba. The Soviets eventually did so, and the crisis ended. p. 711 Freedom ride Sponsored by the Congress of Racial Equality (CORE), freedom rides on buses by civil rights advocates in 1961 in the South were designed to test the enforcement of federal regulations that prohibited segregation in interstate public transportation. p. 714 March on Washington In August 1963, civil rights leaders organized a massive rally in Washington to urge passage of President John F. Kennedy’s civil rights bill. The high point was Martin Luther King, Jr.’s “I Have a Dream” speech. p. 717 War on poverty President Lyndon Johnson declared war on poverty in his 1964 State of the Union address. A new Office of Economic Opportunity (OEO) oversaw programs to help the poor. p. 719 Great Society President Lyndon Johnson’s name for his version of the Democratic reform program. In 1965, Congress passed many Great Society 
 measures, including Medicare, civil rights legislation, and federal aid to education. p. 720 Medicare The 1965 Medicare Act provided Social Security funding for hospitalization insurance for people over age 65 and the disabled and a voluntary plan to cover doctor bills paid in part by the federal government. p. 720 Voting Rights Act of 1965 The 1965 Voting Rights Act banned literacy tests for voting rights and provided for federal registrars to assure the franchise to minority voters. p. 720 Gulf of Tonkin Resolution After a North Vietnamese attack on an American destroyer in the Gulf of Tonkin in 1964, Congress gave President Lyndon authority in this resolution to use force in Vietnam. p. 725 Students for a Democratic Society (SDS) Founded in 1962, the SDS was a popular college student organization that protested shortcomings in American life, notably racial injustice and the Vietnam War. It led thousands of protests before it split apart in the late 1960s. p. 727 National Organization for Women (NOW) Founded in 1966, NOW called for equal employment opportunity and equal pay for women. It also championed the legalization of abortion and an equal rights amendment to the Constitution. p. 730 Tet offensive In February 1968, the Viet Cong launched a major offensive in the cities of South Vietnam. Although caught by surprise, American and South Vietnam forces quashed this attack. But the Tet offensive was a blow to American public opinion and led President Lyndon Johnson to seek a negotiated peace. p. 731

CRITICAL THINKING QUESTIONS 1.
How did American foreign policy in the 1960s reflect the personalities of Kennedy and Johnson? 
 3. How did the War on Poverty influence Johnson’s handling of the Vietnam War?

 2. Why did MLK, Jr., command such respect?

 4. Why did Americans turn to Nixon in 1968?

 MyHistoryLab Media Assignments Find these resources in the Media Assignments folder for Chapter 30 on MyHistoryLab Kennedy Intensifies the Cold War Watch the Video

◾


Kennedy–Nixon Debate p. 707


Watch the Video President John F. Kennedy and
 the Cuban Missile Crisis p. 712

The New Frontier at Home
◾


Watch the Video Photographing the Civil Rights
Movement p. 715


View the Map


Johnson Escalates the Vietnam War
◾
◾


Read the Document The Civil Rights Act of 1964
 p. 719

Complete the Assignment Unintended
Consequences: The Second Great Migration p. 722
View the Map


Vietnam War p. 724


Years of Turmoil
Watch the Video Protests Against
 the Vietnam War p. 727

Watch the Video Civil Rights March on
Washington p. 716


“Let Us Continue”


Impact of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 p. 721


◾


Read the Document National Organization for
Women, Statement of Purpose (1966) p. 730


◾ Indicates Study Plan Media Assignment




The Rise of a New
Conservatism, 1969–1988


Contents and Learning Objectives
THE TEMPTING OF RICHARD NIXON PG. 738

THE REAGAN REVOLUTION PG. 752

 What were the major accomplishments and failures of the Nixon presidency?

 What was the “Reagan revolution”?

THE ECONOMY OF STAGFLATION PG. 742

 How did Reagan reshape American foreign relations?

REAGAN AND THE WORLD PG. 755

 How were oil and inflation linked during the 1970s? ◾ FEATURE ESSAY The Christian Right

PRIVATE LIVES, PUBLIC ISSUES PG. 745

LAW AND SOCIETY
Roe v. Wade: The Struggle over Women’s Reproductive Rights 
 How did private life change during this period?

POLITICS AND DIPLOMACY AFTER WATERGATE PG. 749
Why did the presidencies of Ford and Carter largely fail? 
 Listen to the Audio File on myhistorylab

